Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 2. PUBLIC EDUCATION

SUBTITLE F. CURRICULUM, PROGRAMS, AND SERVICES

CHAPTER 28. COURSES OF STUDY; ADVANCEMENT

SUBCHAPTER A. ESSENTIAL KNOWLEDGE AND SKILLS; CURRICULUM

Sec. 28.001. PURPOSE. It is the intent of the legislature that the essential knowledge and skills developed by the State Board of Education under this subchapter shall require all students to demonstrate the knowledge and skills necessary to read, write, compute, problem solve, think critically, apply technology, and communicate across all subject areas. The essential knowledge and skills shall also prepare and enable all students to continue to learn in postsecondary educational, training, or employment settings.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 28.002. REQUIRED CURRICULUM. (a) Each school district that offers kindergarten through grade 12 shall offer, as a required curriculum:

(1) a foundation curriculum that includes:

(A) English language arts;

(B) mathematics;

(C) science; and

(D) social studies, consisting of Texas, United States, and world history, government, economics, with emphasis on the free enterprise system and its benefits, and geography; and

(2) an enrichment curriculum that includes:

(A) to the extent possible, languages other than English;

(B) health, with emphasis on:

(i) physical health, including the importance of proper nutrition and exercise;

(ii) mental health, including instruction about mental health conditions, substance abuse, skills to manage emotions, establishing and maintaining positive relationships, and responsible decision-making; and

(iii) suicide prevention, including recognizing suicide-related risk factors and warning signs;

(C) physical education;

(D) fine arts;

(E) career and technology education;

(F) technology applications;

(G) religious literature, including the Hebrew Scriptures (Old Testament) and New Testament, and its impact on history and literature; and

(H) personal financial literacy.

(b) The State Board of Education by rule shall designate subjects constituting a well-balanced curriculum to be offered by a school district that does not offer kindergarten through grade 12.

(b-1) In this section, "common core state standards" means the national curriculum standards developed by the Common Core State Standards Initiative.

(b-2) The State Board of Education may not adopt common core state standards to comply with a duty imposed under this chapter.

(b-3) A school district may not use common core state standards to comply with the requirement to provide instruction in the essential knowledge and skills at appropriate grade levels under Subsection (c).

(b-4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, a school district or open-enrollment charter school may not be required to offer any aspect of a common core state standards curriculum.

(c) The State Board of Education, with the direct participation of educators, parents, business and industry representatives, and employers shall by rule identify the essential knowledge and skills of each subject of the required curriculum that all students should be able to demonstrate and that will be used in evaluating instructional materials under Chapter 31 and addressed on the assessment instruments required under Subchapter B, Chapter 39. As a condition of accreditation, the board shall require each district to provide instruction in the essential knowledge and skills at appropriate grade levels and to make available to each high school student in the district an Algebra II course.

(c-1) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules requiring students enrolled in grade levels six, seven, and eight to complete at least one fine arts course during those grade levels as part of a district's fine arts curriculum.

(c-2) Each time the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board revises the Internet database of the coordinating board's official statewide inventory of workforce education courses, the State Board of Education shall by rule revise the essential knowledge and skills of any corresponding career and technology education curriculum as provided by Subsection (c).

(c-3) In adopting the essential knowledge and skills for the technology applications curriculum for kindergarten through grade eight, the State Board of Education shall adopt essential knowledge and skills that include coding, computer programming, computational thinking, and cybersecurity. The State Board of Education shall review and revise, as needed, the essential knowledge and skills of the technology applications curriculum every five years to ensure the curriculum:

(1) is relevant to student education; and

(2) aligns with current or emerging professions.

(c-4) In adopting essential knowledge and skills for English language arts under Subsection (a)(1)(A), the State Board of Education shall specify a list of required vocabulary and at least one literary work to be taught in each grade level. The vocabulary specified by the board must support the essential knowledge and skills adopted for other courses offered under the foundation curriculum under Subsection (a)(1).

(c-5) The State Board of Education shall initiate the process of specifying an initial list of vocabulary and literary works as required by Subsection (c-4) not later than February 1, 2024. The State Board of Education shall request from the agency recommendations regarding the list, and that request for recommendations may be considered an initiation of the process. This subsection expires September 1, 2025.

(d) The physical education curriculum required under Subsection (a)(2)(C) must be sequential, developmentally appropriate, and designed, implemented, and evaluated to enable students to develop the motor, self-management, and other skills, knowledge, attitudes, and confidence necessary to participate in physical activity throughout life. Each school district shall establish specific objectives and goals the district intends to accomplish through the physical education curriculum. In identifying the essential knowledge and skills of physical education, the State Board of Education shall ensure that the curriculum:

(1) emphasizes the knowledge and skills capable of being used during a lifetime of regular physical activity;

(2) is consistent with national physical education standards for:

(A) the information that students should learn about physical activity; and

(B) the physical activities that students should be able to perform;

(3) requires that, on a weekly basis, at least 50 percent of the physical education class be used for actual student physical activity and that the activity be, to the extent practicable, at a moderate or vigorous level;

(4) offers students an opportunity to choose among many types of physical activity in which to participate;

(5) offers students both cooperative and competitive games;

(6) meets the needs of students of all physical ability levels, including students who have a chronic health problem, disability, including a student who is a person with a disability described under Section 29.003(b) or criteria developed by the agency in accordance with that section, or other special need that precludes the student from participating in regular physical education instruction but who might be able to participate in physical education that is suitably adapted and, if applicable, included in the student's individualized education program;

(7) takes into account the effect that gender and cultural differences might have on the degree of student interest in physical activity or on the types of physical activity in which a student is interested;

(8) teaches self-management and movement skills;

(9) teaches cooperation, fair play, and responsible participation in physical activity;

(10) promotes student participation in physical activity outside of school; and

(11) allows physical education classes to be an enjoyable experience for students.

(e) American Sign Language is a language for purposes of Subsection (a)(2)(A). A public school may offer an elective course in the language.

(f) A school district may offer courses for local credit in addition to those in the required curriculum. The State Board of Education shall:

(1) be flexible in approving a course for credit for high school graduation under this subsection; and

(2) approve courses in cybersecurity for credit for high school graduation under this subsection.

(g) A local instructional plan may draw on state curriculum frameworks and program standards as appropriate. Each district is encouraged to exceed minimum requirements of law and State Board of Education rule. Each district shall ensure that all children in the district participate actively in a balanced curriculum designed to meet individual needs. Before the adoption of a major curriculum initiative, including the use of a curriculum management system, a district must use a process that:

(1) includes teacher input;

(2) provides district employees with the opportunity to express opinions regarding the initiative; and

(3) includes a meeting of the board of trustees of the district at which:

(A) information regarding the initiative is presented, including the cost of the initiative and any alternatives that were considered; and

(B) members of the public and district employees are given the opportunity to comment regarding the initiative.

(g-1) A district may also offer a course or other activity, including an apprenticeship or training hours needed to obtain an industry-recognized credential or certificate, that is approved by the board of trustees for credit without obtaining State Board of Education approval if:

(1) the district develops a program under which the district partners with a public or private institution of higher education and local business, labor, and community leaders to develop and provide the courses; and

(2) the course or other activity allows students to enter:

(A) a career or technology training program in the district's region of the state;

(B) an institution of higher education without remediation;

(C) an apprenticeship training program; or

(D) an internship required as part of accreditation toward an industry-recognized credential or certificate for course credit.

(g-2) Each school district shall annually report to the agency the names of the courses, programs, institutions of higher education, and internships in which the district's students have enrolled under Subsection (g-1) and the names of the courses and institutions of higher education in which the district's students have enrolled under Subsection (g-3). The agency shall make available information provided under this subsection to other districts.

(g-3) A district may also offer a course in cybersecurity that is approved by the board of trustees for credit without obtaining State Board of Education approval if the district partners with a public or private institution of higher education that offers an undergraduate degree program in cybersecurity to develop and provide the course.

(h) The State Board of Education and each school district shall require the teaching of informed American patriotism, Texas history, and the free enterprise system in the adoption of instructional materials for kindergarten through grade 12, including the founding documents of the United States. A primary purpose of the public school curriculum is to prepare thoughtful, informed citizens who understand the importance of patriotism and can function productively in a free enterprise society with appreciation for the fundamental democratic principles of our state and national heritage.

(h-1) In adopting the essential knowledge and skills for the foundation curriculum under Subsection (a)(1), the State Board of Education shall, as appropriate, adopt essential knowledge and skills that develop each student's civic knowledge, including an understanding of:

(1) the fundamental moral, political, and intellectual foundations of the American experiment in self-government;

(2) the history, qualities, traditions, and features of civic engagement in the United States;

(3) the structure, function, and processes of government institutions at the federal, state, and local levels; and

(4) the founding documents of the United States, including:

(A) the entirety of the Declaration of Independence;

(B) the entirety of the United States Constitution;

(C) the Federalist Papers, including the entirety of Essays 10 and 51;

(D) excerpts from Alexis de Tocqueville's Democracy in America;

(E) the transcript of the first Lincoln-Douglas debate;

(F) the writings of the founding fathers of the United States;

(G) the entirety of Frederick Douglass's speeches "The Meaning of July Fourth for the Negro" and "What the Black Man Wants"; and

(H) the entirety of Martin Luther King Jr.'s speech "I Have a Dream."

(h-2) In adopting the essential knowledge and skills for the social studies curriculum for each grade level from kindergarten through grade 12, the State Board of Education shall adopt essential knowledge and skills that develop each student's civic knowledge, including:

(1) an understanding of:

(A) the fundamental moral, political, entrepreneurial, and intellectual foundations of the American experiment in self-government;

(B) the history, qualities, traditions, and features of civic engagement in the United States;

(C) the structure, function, and processes of government institutions at the federal, state, and local levels; and

(D) the founding documents of the United States;

(2) the ability to:

(A) analyze and determine the reliability of information sources;

(B) formulate and articulate reasoned positions;

(C) understand the manner in which local, state, and federal government works and operates through the use of simulations and models of governmental and democratic processes;

(D) actively listen and engage in civil discourse, including discourse with those with different viewpoints; and

(E) participate as a citizen in a constitutional democracy by voting; and

(3) an appreciation of:

(A) the importance and responsibility of participating in civic life;

(B) a commitment to the United States and its form of government; and

(C) a commitment to free speech and civil discourse.

(h-3) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 9 (S.B. 3), Sec. 6, eff. December 2, 2021.

(h-4) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 9 (S.B. 3), Sec. 6, eff. December 2, 2021.

(h-5) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 9 (S.B. 3), Sec. 6, eff. December 2, 2021.

(h-6) In providing instruction regarding the founding documents of the United States as described by Subsection (h-1)(4), a school district or open-enrollment charter school shall use those documents as part of the instructional materials for the instruction.

(h-7) The agency shall ensure that each school district or open-enrollment charter school teaches civics education as part of the district's social studies curriculum in a manner consistent with the essential knowledge and skills adopted under Subsection (h-2).

(h-8) Nothing in Subsection (h-2) or (h-7) may be construed as limiting the teaching of or instruction in the essential knowledge and skills adopted under this subchapter.

(i) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules for the implementation of this subchapter. Except as provided by Subsection (j), the board may not adopt rules that designate the methodology used by a teacher or the time spent by a teacher or a student on a particular task or subject.

(j) The State Board of Education by rule may require laboratory instruction in secondary science courses and may require a specific amount or percentage of time in a secondary science course that must be laboratory instruction.

(k) The State Board of Education, in consultation with the Department of State Health Services and the Texas Diabetes Council, shall develop a diabetes education program that a school district may use in the health curriculum under Subsection (a)(2)(B).

(l) A school district shall require a student enrolled in full-day prekindergarten, in kindergarten, or in a grade level below grade six to participate in moderate or vigorous daily physical activity for at least 30 minutes throughout the school year as part of the district's physical education curriculum or through structured activity during a school campus's daily recess. To the extent practicable, a school district shall require a student enrolled in prekindergarten on less than a full-day basis to participate in the same type and amount of physical activity as a student enrolled in full-day prekindergarten. A school district shall require students enrolled in grade levels six, seven, and eight to participate in moderate or vigorous daily physical activity for at least 30 minutes for at least four semesters during those grade levels as part of the district's physical education curriculum. If a school district determines, for any particular grade level below grade six, that requiring moderate or vigorous daily physical activity is impractical due to scheduling concerns or other factors, the district may as an alternative require a student in that grade level to participate in moderate or vigorous physical activity for at least 135 minutes during each school week. Additionally, a school district may as an alternative require a student enrolled in a grade level for which the district uses block scheduling to participate in moderate or vigorous physical activity for at least 225 minutes during each period of two school weeks. A school district must provide for an exemption for:

(1) any student who is unable to participate in the required physical activity because of illness or disability; and

(2) a middle school or junior high school student who participates in an extracurricular activity with a moderate or vigorous physical activity component that is considered a structured activity under rules adopted by the commissioner.

(l-1) In adopting rules relating to an activity described by Subsection (l)(2), the commissioner may permit an exemption for a student who participates in a school-related activity or an activity sponsored by a private league or club only if the student provides proof of participation in the activity.

(l-2) To encourage school districts to promote physical activity for children through classroom curricula for health and physical education, the agency, in consultation with the Department of State Health Services, shall designate nationally recognized health and physical education program guidelines that a school district may use in the health curriculum under Subsection (a)(2)(B) or the physical education curriculum under Subsection (a)(2)(C).

(l-3)(1) This subsection may be cited as "Lauren's Law."

(2) The State Board of Education, the Department of State Health Services, or a school district may not adopt any rule, policy, or program under Subsections (a), (k), (l), (l-1), or (l-2) that would prohibit a parent or grandparent of a student from providing any food product of the parent's or grandparent's choice to:

(A) children in the classroom of the child of the parent or grandparent on the occasion of the child's birthday; or

(B) children at a school-designated function.

(m) Section 2001.039, Government Code, as added by Chapter 1499, Acts of the 76th Legislature, Regular Session, 1999, does not apply to a rule adopted by the State Board of Education under Subsection (c) or (d).

(n) The State Board of Education may by rule develop and implement a plan designed to incorporate foundation curriculum requirements into the career and technology education curriculum under Subsection (a)(2)(E).

(o) In approving career and technology courses, the State Board of Education must determine that at least 50 percent of the approved courses are cost-effective for a school district to implement.

(p) The State Board of Education, in conjunction with the office of the attorney general, shall develop a parenting and paternity awareness program that a school district shall use in the district's high school health curriculum. A school district may use the program developed under this subsection in the district's middle or junior high school curriculum. At the discretion of the district, a teacher may modify the suggested sequence and pace of the program at any grade level. The program must:

(1) address parenting skills and responsibilities, including child support and other legal rights and responsibilities that come with parenthood;

(2) address relationship skills, including money management, communication skills, and marriage preparation; and

(3) in district middle, junior high, or high schools that do not have a family violence prevention program, address skills relating to the prevention of family violence.

(p-2) A school district may develop or adopt research-based programs and curriculum materials for use in conjunction with the program developed under Subsection (p). The programs and curriculum materials may provide instruction in:

(1) child development;

(2) parenting skills, including child abuse and neglect prevention; and

(3) assertiveness skills to prevent teenage pregnancy, abusive relationships, and family violence.

(p-3) The agency shall evaluate programs and curriculum materials developed under Subsection (p-2) and distribute to other school districts information regarding those programs and materials.

(p-4) A student under 14 years of age may not participate in a program developed under Subsection (p) without the permission of the student's parent or person standing in parental relation to the student.

(q) Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211, Sec. 78(b)(1), eff. September 1, 2014.

(r) In adopting the essential knowledge and skills for the health curriculum under Subsection (a)(2)(B), the State Board of Education shall adopt essential knowledge and skills that address the science, risk factors, causes, dangers, consequences, signs, symptoms, and treatment of substance abuse, including the use of illegal drugs, abuse of prescription drugs, abuse of alcohol such as by binge drinking or other excessive drinking resulting in alcohol poisoning, inhaling solvents, and other forms of substance abuse. The agency shall compile a list of evidence-based substance abuse awareness programs from which a school district shall choose a program to use in the district's middle school, junior high school, and high school health curriculum. In this subsection, "evidence-based substance abuse awareness program" means a program, practice, or strategy that has been proven to effectively prevent substance abuse among students, as determined by evaluations that are evidence-based.

(s) In this subsection, "bullying" has the meaning assigned by Section 37.0832 and "harassment" has the meaning assigned by Section 37.001. In addition to any other essential knowledge and skills the State Board of Education adopts for the health curriculum under Subsection (a)(2)(B), the board shall adopt for the health curriculum, in consultation with the Texas School Safety Center, essential knowledge and skills that include evidence-based practices that will effectively address awareness, prevention, identification, self-defense in response to, and resolution of and intervention in bullying and harassment.

(t) The State Board of Education, in consultation with the commissioner of higher education and business and industry leaders, shall develop an advanced language course that a school district may use in the curriculum under Subsection (a)(2)(A) to provide students with instruction in industry-related terminology that prepares students to communicate in a language other than English in a specific professional, business, or industry environment.

(w) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 352 (H.B. 18), Sec. 4.01(2), eff. December 1, 2019.

(z) The State Board of Education by rule shall require each school district to incorporate instruction in digital citizenship into the district's curriculum, including information regarding the potential criminal consequences of cyberbullying. In this subsection:

(1) "Cyberbullying" has the meaning assigned by Section 37.0832.

(2) "Digital citizenship" means the standards of appropriate, responsible, and healthy online behavior, including the ability to access, analyze, evaluate, create, and act on all forms of digital communication.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1285, Sec. 4.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 907, Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2001; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 925, Sec. 3, eff. June 14, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 61, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1264, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(14), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 784 (S.B. 42), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 254 (H.B. 2176), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 856 (H.B. 1287), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1377 (S.B. 530), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 529 (S.B. 1344), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 773 (S.B. 891), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 895 (H.B. 3), Sec. 25, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1419 (H.B. 3076), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1421 (S.B. 1219), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 91 (S.B. 1303), Sec. 27.001(5), eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 776 (H.B. 1942), Sec. 4, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 6 (S.B. 6), Sec. 13, eff. July 19, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 8(a), eff. June 10, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 78(b)(1), eff. September 1, 2014.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 796 (S.B. 1474), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 462), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1026 (H.B. 2662), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 89 (H.B. 440), Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 729 (H.B. 1431), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1175 (S.B. 968), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1088 (H.B. 3593), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 352 (H.B. 18), Sec. 1.07, eff. December 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 352 (H.B. 18), Sec. 4.01(2), eff. December 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 464 (S.B. 11), Sec. 7, eff. June 6, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1149 (H.B. 2984), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 772 (H.B. 3979), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1005 (H.B. 4509), Sec. 3, eff. June 18, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 9 (S.B. 3), Sec. 3, eff. December 2, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 9 (S.B. 3), Sec. 4, eff. December 2, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 9 (S.B. 3), Sec. 6, eff. December 2, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 818 (H.B. 1605), Sec. 7, eff. June 13, 2023.

Sec. 28.0021. PERSONAL FINANCIAL LITERACY. (a) The Texas essential knowledge and skills and, as applicable, Section 28.025 shall include instruction in personal financial literacy, including instruction in methods of paying for college and other postsecondary education and training, in:

(1) mathematics instruction in kindergarten through grade eight; and

(2) one or more courses offered for high school graduation.

(b) Each school district and each open-enrollment charter school that offers a high school program shall provide an elective course in personal financial literacy that meets the requirements for a one-half elective credit under Section 28.025, using materials approved by the State Board of Education. The instruction in personal financial literacy must include instruction on completing the application for federal student aid provided by the United States Department of Education. In fulfilling the requirement to provide financial literacy instruction under this section, a school district or open-enrollment charter school may use an existing state, federal, private, or nonprofit program that provides students without charge the instruction described under this section.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 494 (H.B. 492), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 214 (H.B. 34), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (S.B. 290), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1026 (H.B. 2662), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1026 (H.B. 2662), Sec. 3, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 28.0022. CERTAIN INSTRUCTIONAL REQUIREMENTS AND PROHIBITIONS. (a) For any course or subject, including an innovative course, for a grade level from kindergarten through grade 12:

(1) a teacher may not be compelled to discuss a widely debated and currently controversial issue of public policy or social affairs;

(2) a teacher who chooses to discuss a topic described by Subdivision (1) shall explore that topic objectively and in a manner free from political bias;

(3) a school district, open-enrollment charter school, or teacher may not require, make part of a course, or award a grade or course credit, including extra credit, for a student's:

(A) work for, affiliation with, or service learning in association with any organization engaged in:

(i) lobbying for legislation at the federal, state, or local level, if the student's duties involve directly or indirectly attempting to influence social or public policy or the outcome of legislation; or

(ii) social policy advocacy or public policy advocacy;

(B) political activism, lobbying, or efforts to persuade members of the legislative or executive branch at the federal, state, or local level to take specific actions by direct communication; or

(C) participation in any internship, practicum, or similar activity involving social policy advocacy or public policy advocacy; and

(4) a teacher, administrator, or other employee of a state agency, school district, or open-enrollment charter school may not:

(A) require or make part of a course inculcation in the concept that:

(i) one race or sex is inherently superior to another race or sex;

(ii) an individual, by virtue of the individual's race or sex, is inherently racist, sexist, or oppressive, whether consciously or unconsciously;

(iii) an individual should be discriminated against or receive adverse treatment solely or partly because of the individual's race or sex;

(iv) an individual's moral character, standing, or worth is necessarily determined by the individual's race or sex;

(v) an individual, by virtue of the individual's race or sex, bears responsibility, blame, or guilt for actions committed by other members of the same race or sex;

(vi) meritocracy or traits such as a hard work ethic are racist or sexist or were created by members of a particular race to oppress members of another race;

(vii) the advent of slavery in the territory that is now the United States constituted the true founding of the United States; or

(viii) with respect to their relationship to American values, slavery and racism are anything other than deviations from, betrayals of, or failures to live up to the authentic founding principles of the United States, which include liberty and equality;

(B) teach, instruct, or train any administrator, teacher, or staff member of a state agency, school district, or open-enrollment charter school to adopt a concept listed under Paragraph (A); or

(C) require an understanding of the 1619 Project.

(b) Subsection (a)(3) does not apply to a student's participation in:

(1) community charitable projects, such as building community gardens, volunteering at local food banks, or other service projects;

(2) an internship or practicum:

(A) for which the student receives course credit under a career and technology education program or under the P-TECH program established under Section 29.553; and

(B) that does not involve the student directly engaging in lobbying, social policy advocacy, or public policy advocacy; or

(3) a program that prepares the student for participation and leadership in this country's democratic process at the federal, state, or local level through the simulation of a governmental process, including the development of public policy.

(c) A state agency, school district, or open-enrollment charter school may not accept private funding for the purpose of developing a curriculum, purchasing or selecting curriculum materials, or providing teacher training or professional development related to a concept listed in Subsection (a)(4)(A).

(d) A school district or open-enrollment charter school may not implement, interpret, or enforce any rule in a manner that would result in the punishment of a student for reasonably discussing the concepts described by Subsection (a)(4) in school or during a school-sponsored activity or have a chilling effect on reasonable student discussions involving those concepts in school or during a school-sponsored activity.

(e) Nothing in this section may be construed as limiting the teaching of or instruction in the essential knowledge and skills adopted under this subchapter.

(f) This section does not create a private cause of action against a teacher, administrator, or other employee of a school district or open-enrollment charter school. A school district or open-enrollment charter school may take appropriate action involving the employment of any teacher, administrator, or other employee based on the individual's compliance with state and federal laws and district policies.

(g) Nothing in this section may be construed as prohibiting a teacher employed by a school district or open-enrollment charter school from directing a classroom activity that involves students communicating with an elected official so long as the district, school, or teacher does not influence the content of a student's communication.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 9 (S.B. 3), Sec. 5, eff. December 2, 2021.

Sec. 28.0023. CARDIOPULMONARY RESUSCITATION AND AUTOMATED EXTERNAL DEFIBRILLATOR INSTRUCTION. (a) Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1269, Sec. 3, eff. June 14, 2013.

(b) The State Board of Education by rule shall require instruction in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and the use of an automated external defibrillator, for students in grades 7 through 12.

(c) A school district or open-enrollment charter school shall provide instruction to students in grades 7 through 12 in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and the use of an automated external defibrillator in a manner consistent with the requirements of this section and State Board of Education rules adopted under this section. The instruction may be provided as a part of any course. A student shall receive the instruction at least once before graduation.

(d) A school administrator may waive the curriculum requirement under this section for an eligible student who has a disability.

(e) Cardiopulmonary resuscitation instruction must include training in cardiopulmonary resuscitation techniques and the use of an automated external defibrillator that has been developed:

(1) by the American Heart Association or the American Red Cross; or

(2) using nationally recognized, evidence-based guidelines for emergency cardiovascular care and incorporating psychomotor skills to support the instruction.

(f) For purposes of Subsection (e), "psychomotor skills" means hands-on practice to support cognitive learning. The term does not include cognitive-only instruction and training.

(g) A school district or open-enrollment charter school may use emergency medical technicians, paramedics, police officers, firefighters, representatives of the American Heart Association or the American Red Cross, teachers, other school employees, or other similarly qualified individuals to provide instruction and training under this section. Instruction provided under this section is not required to result in certification in cardiopulmonary resuscitation or the use of an automated external defibrillator. If instruction is intended to result in certification in cardiopulmonary resuscitation or the use of an automated external defibrillator, the course instructor must be authorized to provide the instruction by the American Heart Association, the American Red Cross, or a similar nationally recognized association.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1371 (S.B. 7), Sec. 4, eff. June 15, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1269 (H.B. 897), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1269 (H.B. 897), Sec. 3, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 625 (H.B. 4375), Sec. 3, eff. June 11, 2023.

Sec. 28.0024. SCHOOL-BASED SAVINGS PROGRAM. (a) A school district or open-enrollment charter school may establish a school-based savings program to facilitate increased awareness of the importance of saving for higher education and facilitate personal financial literacy instruction. A district or school may offer the program in conjunction with a personal financial literacy course under Section 28.0021.

(b) A school-based savings program may, through partnerships with appropriate institutions, promote:

(1) general savings, by offering savings accounts or certificates of deposit through partner financial institutions; or

(2) savings dedicated for higher education, by offering through partner institutions the following accounts or bonds the primary purpose of which must be to pay expenses associated with higher education:

(A) an account authorized under Section 529, Internal Revenue Code of 1986;

(B) a Coverdell education savings account established under 26 U.S.C. Section 530;

(C) a certificate of deposit;

(D) a savings account; and

(E) a Series I savings bond.

(c) A district or school establishing a program under this section:

(1) shall seek to establish partnerships with appropriate institutions that are able to offer an account or bond under Subsection (b); and

(2) may seek to establish partnerships with public sector partners, private businesses, nonprofit organizations, and philanthropic organizations in the community.

(d) A partnership established under Subsection (c) between a district or school and:

(1) an appropriate institution may allow a student in the program or the student and an adult in the student's family jointly to have an opportunity to establish an account or purchase a bond under Subsection (b); and

(2) an appropriate institution, public sector partner, private business, or nonprofit or philanthropic organization may provide:

(A) a structure for the management of the program; and

(B) incentives that encourage contribution to a school-based account or purchase of a bond under Subsection (b), including incentives that provide matching funds or seed funding.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1265 (H.B. 3987), Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2015.

Sec. 28.0027. DISTRICT CURRICULUM SCOPE, SEQUENCE, AND INSTRUCTIONAL MATERIAL. (a) In adopting a recommended or designated scope and sequence or instructional materials for a subject in the required curriculum under Section 28.002(a) in a particular grade level, a school district shall ensure sufficient time is provided for teachers to teach and students to learn the essential knowledge and skills for that subject and grade level.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), a school district may not penalize a teacher who does not follow the pacing of recommended or designated instructional materials or the pacing of the recommended or designated scope and sequence for a subject in the required curriculum under Section 28.002(a) in a particular grade level based on the teacher's determination that the teacher's students need more or less time in a specific area to demonstrate proficiency in the essential knowledge and skills for that subject and grade level.

(c) A school district may take appropriate action with respect to a teacher for conduct described by Subsection (b) based on documented evidence of a deficiency in classroom instruction obtained through observation or substantiated and documented third-party information.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1324 (H.B. 4310), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2019.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 818 (H.B. 1605), Sec. 8, eff. June 13, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 818 (H.B. 1605), Sec. 9, eff. June 13, 2023.

Sec. 28.003. EDUCATIONAL PROGRAM ACCESS. (a) If the parents or guardians of at least 22 students at a school request a transfer for the same school year to another school in the district for the purpose of enrolling in an educational program offered at that school, beginning with the following school year the district shall:

(1) offer the program at the school from which the transfers were requested; or

(2) offer the program at the school from which the transfers were requested by teleconference, if available to the district.

(b) In this section, "educational program" means a course or series of courses in the required curriculum under Section 28.002, other than a fine arts course under Section 28.002(a)(2)(D) or a career and technology course under Section 28.002(a)(2)(E).

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 6 (S.B. 6), Sec. 15, eff. July 19, 2011.

For expiration of Subsections (i-2) and (i-3), see Subsection (i-3).

Sec. 28.004. LOCAL SCHOOL HEALTH ADVISORY COUNCIL AND HEALTH EDUCATION INSTRUCTION. (a) The board of trustees of each school district shall establish a local school health advisory council to assist the district in ensuring that local community values are reflected in the district's health education instruction.

(b) A school district must consider the recommendations of the local school health advisory council before changing the district's health education curriculum or instruction.

(c) The local school health advisory council's duties include recommending:

(1) the number of hours of instruction to be provided in:

(A) health education in kindergarten through grade eight; and

(B) if the school district requires health education for high school graduation, health education, including physical health education and mental health education, in grades 9 through 12;

(2) policies, procedures, strategies, and curriculum appropriate for specific grade levels designed to prevent physical health concerns, including obesity, cardiovascular disease, Type 2 diabetes, and mental health concerns, including suicide, through coordination of:

(A) health education, which must address physical health concerns and mental health concerns to ensure the integration of physical health education and mental health education;

(B) physical education and physical activity;

(C) nutrition services;

(D) parental involvement;

(E) instruction on substance abuse prevention;

(F) school health services, including mental health services;

(G) a comprehensive school counseling program under Section 33.005;

(H) a safe and healthy school environment; and

(I) school employee wellness;

(3) appropriate grade levels and methods of instruction for human sexuality instruction;

(4) strategies for integrating the curriculum components specified by Subdivision (2) with the following elements in a coordinated school health program for the district:

(A) school health services, including physical health services and mental health services, if provided at a campus by the district or by a third party under a contract with the district;

(B) a comprehensive school counseling program under Section 33.005;

(C) a safe and healthy school environment; and

(D) school employee wellness;

(5) if feasible, joint use agreements or strategies for collaboration between the school district and community organizations or agencies;

(6) strategies to increase parental awareness regarding:

(A) risky behaviors and early warning signs of suicide risks and behavioral health concerns, including mental health disorders and substance use disorders; and

(B) available community programs and services that address risky behaviors, suicide risks, and behavioral health concerns;

(7) appropriate grade levels and curriculum for instruction regarding the dangers of opioids, including instruction on:

(A) opioid addiction and abuse, including addiction to and abuse of synthetic opioids such as fentanyl; and

(B) methods of administering an opioid antagonist, as defined by Section 483.101, Health and Safety Code; and

(8) appropriate grade levels and curriculum for instruction regarding child abuse, family violence, dating violence, and sex trafficking, including likely warning signs that a child may be at risk for sex trafficking, provided that the local school health advisory council's recommendations under this subdivision do not conflict with the essential knowledge and skills developed by the State Board of Education under this subchapter.

(d) The board of trustees shall appoint at least five members to the local school health advisory council. A majority of the members must be persons who are parents of students enrolled in the district and who are not employed by the district. One of those members shall serve as chair or co-chair of the council. The board of trustees also may appoint one or more persons from each of the following groups or a representative from a group other than a group specified under this subsection:

(1) classroom teachers employed by the district;

(2) school counselors certified under Subchapter B, Chapter 21, employed by the district;

(3) school administrators employed by the district;

(4) district students;

(5) health care professionals licensed or certified to practice in this state, including medical or mental health professionals;

(6) the business community;

(7) law enforcement;

(8) senior citizens;

(9) the clergy;

(10) nonprofit health organizations; and

(11) local domestic violence programs.

(d-1) The local school health advisory council shall meet at least four times each year. For each meeting, the council shall:

(1) at least 72 hours before the meeting:

(A) post notice of the date, hour, place, and subject of the meeting on a bulletin board in the central administrative office of each campus in the school district; and

(B) ensure that the notice required under Paragraph (A) is posted on the district's Internet website, if the district has an Internet website;

(2) prepare and maintain minutes of the meeting that state the subject and content of each deliberation and each vote, order, decision, or other action taken by the council during the meeting;

(3) make an audio or video recording of the meeting; and

(4) not later than the 10th day after the meeting, submit the minutes and audio or video recording of the meeting to the district.

(d-2) As soon as practicable after receipt of the minutes and audio or video recording under Subsection (d-1)(4), the school district shall post the minutes and audio or video recording on the district's Internet website, if the district has an Internet website.

(e) Any course materials and instruction relating to human sexuality, sexually transmitted diseases, or human immunodeficiency virus or acquired immune deficiency syndrome shall be selected by the board of trustees with the advice of the local school health advisory council and must:

(1) present abstinence from sexual activity as the preferred choice of behavior in relationship to all sexual activity for unmarried persons of school age;

(2) devote more attention to abstinence from sexual activity than to any other behavior;

(3) emphasize that abstinence from sexual activity, if used consistently and correctly, is the only method that is 100 percent effective in preventing pregnancy, sexually transmitted diseases, infection with human immunodeficiency virus or acquired immune deficiency syndrome, and the emotional trauma associated with adolescent sexual activity;

(4) direct adolescents to a standard of behavior in which abstinence from sexual activity before marriage is the most effective way to prevent pregnancy, sexually transmitted diseases, and infection with human immunodeficiency virus or acquired immune deficiency syndrome; and

(5) teach contraception and condom use in terms of human use reality rates instead of theoretical laboratory rates, if instruction on contraception and condoms is included in curriculum content.

(e-1) The board of trustees shall adopt a policy establishing a process for the adoption of curriculum materials for the school district's human sexuality instruction. The policy must require:

(1) the board to adopt a resolution convening the local school health advisory council for the purpose of making recommendations regarding the curriculum materials;

(2) the local school health advisory council to:

(A) after the board's adoption of the resolution under Subdivision (1), hold at least two public meetings on the curriculum materials before adopting recommendations; and

(B) provide the recommendations adopted under Paragraph (A) to the board at a public meeting of the board; and

(3) the board, after receipt of the local school health advisory council's recommendations under Subdivision (2), to take action on the adoption of the recommendations by a record vote at a public meeting.

(e-2) Curriculum materials proposed to be adopted for the school district's human sexuality instruction must be made available as provided by Subsection (j)(1) or (2)(A) or (C), as applicable.

(e-3) Before adopting curriculum materials for the school district's human sexuality instruction, the board of trustees shall ensure that the curriculum materials are:

(1) based on the advice of the local school health advisory council;

(2) suitable for the subject and grade level for which the curriculum materials are intended; and

(3) reviewed by academic experts in the subject and grade level for which the curriculum materials are intended.

(f) A school district may not distribute condoms in connection with instruction relating to human sexuality.

(g) A school district that provides human sexuality instruction may separate students according to sex for instructional purposes.

(h) The board of trustees shall determine the specific content of the district's instruction in human sexuality, in accordance with this section.

(i) Before each school year, a school district shall provide written notice to a parent of each student enrolled in the district of the board of trustees' decision regarding whether the district will provide human sexuality instruction to district students. If instruction will be provided, the notice must include:

(1) a statement informing the parent of the human sexuality instruction requirements under state law;

(2) a detailed description of the content of the district's human sexuality instruction and a general schedule on which the instruction will be provided;

(3) a statement of the parent's right to:

(A) at the parent's discretion, review or purchase a copy of curriculum materials as provided by Subsection (j);

(B) remove the student from any part of the district's human sexuality instruction without subjecting the student to any disciplinary action, academic penalty, or other sanction imposed by the district or the student's school; and

(C) use the grievance procedure as provided by Subsection (i-1) or the appeals process under Section 7.057 concerning a complaint of a violation of this section;

(4) a statement that any curriculum materials in the public domain used for the district's human sexuality instruction must be posted on the district's Internet website, if the district has an Internet website, and the Internet website address at which the curriculum materials are located; and

(5) information describing the opportunities for parental involvement in the development of the curriculum to be used in human sexuality instruction, including information regarding the local school health advisory council established under Subsection (a).

(i-1) A parent may use the grievance procedure adopted under Section 26.011 concerning a complaint of a violation of this section.

(i-2) Before a student may be provided with human sexuality instruction, a school district must obtain the written consent of the student's parent. A request for written consent under this subsection:

(1) may not be included with any other notification or request for written consent provided to the parent, other than the notice provided under Subsection (i); and

(2) must be provided to the parent not later than the 14th day before the date on which the human sexuality instruction begins.

(i-3) Subsection (i-2) and this subsection expire August 1, 2024.

(j) A school district shall make all curriculum materials used in the district's human sexuality instruction or instruction relating to the prevention of child abuse, family violence, dating violence, and sex trafficking, available by:

(1) for curriculum materials in the public domain:

(A) providing a copy of the curriculum materials by mail or e-mail to a parent of a student enrolled in the district on the parent's request; and

(B) posting the curriculum materials on the district's Internet website, if the district has an Internet website; and

(2) for copyrighted curriculum materials, allowing a parent of a student enrolled in the district to:

(A) review the curriculum materials at the student's campus at any time during regular business hours;

(B) purchase a copy of the curriculum materials from the publisher as provided by the district's purchase agreement for the curriculum materials under Subsection (j-1) or (j-2); or

(C) review the curriculum materials online through a secure electronic account in a manner that prevents the curriculum materials from being copied and that otherwise complies with copyright law.

(j-1) If a school district purchases from a publisher copyrighted curriculum materials for use in the district's human sexuality instruction, the district shall ensure that the purchase agreement provides for a means by which a parent of a student enrolled in the district may purchase a copy of the curriculum materials from the publisher at a price that does not exceed the price per unit paid by the district for the curriculum materials.

(j-2) If a school district purchases from a publisher copyrighted curriculum materials for use in the district's instruction relating to the prevention of child abuse, family violence, dating violence, and sex trafficking, the district shall ensure that the purchase agreement provides for a means by which a parent of a student enrolled in the district may purchase a copy of the curriculum materials from the publisher at a price that does not exceed the price per unit paid by the district for the curriculum materials.

(k) A school district shall publish in the student handbook and post on the district's Internet website, if the district has an Internet website:

(1) a statement of the policies and procedures adopted to promote the physical health and mental health of students, the physical health and mental health resources available at each campus, contact information for the nearest providers of essential public health services under Chapter 121, Health and Safety Code, and the contact information for the nearest local mental health authority;

(2) a statement of the policies adopted to ensure that elementary school, middle school, and junior high school students engage in at least the amount and level of physical activity required by Section 28.002(l);

(3) a statement of:

(A) the number of times during the preceding year the district's school health advisory council has met;

(B) whether the district has adopted and enforces policies to ensure that district campuses comply with agency vending machine and food service guidelines for restricting student access to vending machines; and

(C) whether the district has adopted and enforces policies and procedures that prescribe penalties for the use of e-cigarettes, as defined by Section 38.006, and tobacco products by students and others on school campuses or at school-sponsored or school-related activities;

(4) a statement providing notice to parents that they can request in writing their child's physical fitness assessment results at the end of the school year; and

(5) for each campus in the district, a statement of whether the campus has a full-time nurse or full-time school counselor.

(l) The local school health advisory council shall consider and make policy recommendations to the district concerning the importance of daily recess for elementary school students. The council must consider research regarding unstructured and undirected play, academic and social development, and the health benefits of daily recess in making the recommendations. The council shall ensure that local community values are reflected in any policy recommendation made to the district under this subsection.

(l-1) The local school health advisory council shall establish a physical activity and fitness planning subcommittee to consider issues relating to student physical activity and fitness and make policy recommendations to increase physical activity and improve fitness among students.

(m) In addition to performing other duties, the local school health advisory council shall submit to the board of trustees, at least annually, a written report that includes:

(1) any council recommendation concerning the school district's health education curriculum and instruction or related matters that the council has not previously submitted to the board;

(2) any suggested modification to a council recommendation previously submitted to the board;

(3) a detailed explanation of the council's activities during the period between the date of the current report and the date of the last prior written report; and

(4) any recommendations made by the physical activity and fitness planning subcommittee.

(n) Any joint use agreement that a school district and community organization or agency enter into based on a recommendation of the local school health advisory council under Subsection (c)(5) must address liability for the school district and community organization or agency in the agreement.

(o) The local school health advisory council shall make policy recommendations to the district to increase parental awareness of suicide-related risk factors and warning signs and available community suicide prevention services.

(p) In this section:

(1) "Curriculum materials" includes the curriculum, teacher training materials, and any other materials used in providing instruction.

(2) "Human sexuality instruction," "instruction in human sexuality," and "instruction relating to human sexuality" include instruction in reproductive health.

(q) Any course materials relating to the prevention of child abuse, family violence, dating violence, and sex trafficking shall be selected by the board of trustees with the advice of the local school health advisory council.

(q-1) The board of trustees shall adopt a policy establishing a process for the adoption of curriculum materials for the school district's instruction relating to the prevention of child abuse, family violence, dating violence, and sex trafficking. The policy must require:

(1) the board to adopt a resolution convening the local school health advisory council for the purpose of making recommendations regarding the curriculum materials;

(2) the local school health advisory council to:

(A) after the board's adoption of the resolution under Subdivision (1), hold at least two public meetings on the curriculum materials before adopting recommendations; and

(B) provide the recommendations adopted under Paragraph (A) to the board at a public meeting of the board; and

(3) the board, after receipt of the local school health advisory council's recommendations under Subdivision (2), to take action on the adoption of the recommendations by a record vote at a public meeting.

(q-2) Curriculum materials proposed to be adopted for the school district's instruction relating to the prevention of child abuse, family violence, dating violence, and sex trafficking must be made available as provided by Subsection (j)(1) or (2)(A) or (C), as applicable.

(q-3) Before adopting curriculum materials for the school district's instruction relating to the prevention of child abuse, family violence, dating violence, and sex trafficking, the board of trustees shall ensure that the curriculum materials are:

(1) based on the advice of the local school health advisory council;

(2) suitable for the subject and grade level for which the curriculum materials are intended; and

(3) reviewed by academic experts in the subject and grade level for which the curriculum materials are intended.

(q-4) The board of trustees shall determine the specific content of the district's instruction relating to the prevention of child abuse, family violence, dating violence, and sex trafficking in accordance with this subchapter, including the essential knowledge and skills addressing these topics developed by the State Board of Education.

(q-5) Before each school year, a school district shall provide written notice to a parent of each student enrolled in the district of the board of trustees' decision regarding whether the district will provide instruction relating to the prevention of child abuse, family violence, dating violence, and sex trafficking to district students. If instruction will be provided, the notice must include:

(1) a statement informing the parent of the requirements under state law regarding instruction relating to the prevention of child abuse, family violence, dating violence, and sex trafficking;

(2) a detailed description of the content of the district's instruction relating to the prevention of child abuse, family violence, dating violence, and sex trafficking;

(3) a statement of the parent's right to:

(A) at the parent's discretion, review or purchase a copy of curriculum materials as provided by Subsection (j);

(B) remove the student from any part of the district's instruction relating to the prevention of child abuse, family violence, dating violence, and sex trafficking without subjecting the student to any disciplinary action, academic penalty, or other sanction imposed by the district or the student's school; and

(C) use the grievance procedure as provided by Subsection (i-1) or the appeals process under Section 7.057 concerning a complaint of a violation of this section;

(4) a statement that any curriculum materials in the public domain used for the district's instruction regarding the prevention of child abuse, family violence, dating violence, and sex trafficking must be posted on the district's Internet website address at which the curriculum materials are located; and

(5) information describing the opportunities for parental involvement in the development of the curriculum to be used in instruction relating to the prevention of child abuse, family violence, dating violence, and sex trafficking, including information regarding the local school health advisory council established under Subsection (a).

(q-6) Before a student may be provided with instruction relating to the prevention of child abuse, family violence, dating violence, and sex trafficking, a school district must obtain the written consent of the student's parent. A request for written consent under this subsection:

(1) may not be included with any other notification or request for written consent provided to the parent, other than the notice provided under Subsection (q-5); and

(2) must be provided to the parent not later than the 14th day before the date on which the instruction relating to the prevention of child abuse, family violence, dating violence, and sex trafficking begins.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 907, Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 944, Sec. 1, 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 784 (S.B. 42), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1377 (S.B. 530), Sec. 2, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 729 (S.B. 283), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1235 (S.B. 736), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 892 (H.B. 1018), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1321 (S.B. 460), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 181 (S.B. 97), Sec. 37, eff. October 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (S.B. 489), Sec. 1, eff. May 28, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 331 (S.B. 435), Sec. 1, eff. May 31, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 352 (H.B. 18), Sec. 1.08, eff. December 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 464 (S.B. 11), Sec. 8, eff. June 6, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 806 (H.B. 1525), Sec. 7, eff. June 16, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 5.006, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 13 (S.B. 9), Sec. 2, eff. December 2, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 917 (H.B. 3908), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2023.

Sec. 28.005. LANGUAGE OF INSTRUCTION. (a) Except as provided by this section, English shall be the basic language of instruction in public schools.

(b) It is the policy of this state to ensure the mastery of English by all students, except that bilingual instruction may be offered or permitted in situations in which bilingual instruction is necessary to ensure students' reasonable proficiency in the English language and ability to achieve academic success.

(c) A school district may adopt a dual language immersion program for students enrolled in elementary school grades as provided by Section 28.0051.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 925, Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2001.

Sec. 28.0051. DUAL LANGUAGE IMMERSION PROGRAM. (a) A dual language immersion program should be designed to produce students with a demonstrated mastery, in both English and one other language, of the required curriculum under Section 28.002(a).

(b) The commissioner by rule shall adopt:

(1) minimum requirements for a dual language immersion program implemented by a school district;

(2) standards for evaluating:

(A) the success of a dual language immersion program; and

(B) the performance of schools that implement a dual language immersion program; and

(3) standards for recognizing:

(A) schools that offer an exceptional dual language immersion program; and

(B) students who successfully complete a dual language immersion program.

(c) A school district may implement a dual language immersion program in a manner and at elementary grade levels consistent with rules adopted by the commissioner under this section.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 925, Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2001.

Sec. 28.006. READING DIAGNOSIS. (a) The commissioner shall develop recommendations for school districts for:

(1) administering reading instruments to diagnose student reading development and comprehension;

(2) training educators in administering the reading instruments; and

(3) applying the results of the reading instruments to the instructional program.

(b) The commissioner shall adopt a list of reading instruments that a school district may use to diagnose student reading development and comprehension. For use in diagnosing the reading development and comprehension of kindergarten students, the commissioner shall adopt a multidimensional assessment tool that includes a reading instrument and tests at least three developmental skills, including literacy. A multidimensional assessment tool administered as provided by this subsection is considered to be a reading instrument for purposes of this section. A district-level committee established under Subchapter F, Chapter 11, may adopt a list of reading instruments for use in the district in a grade level other than kindergarten in addition to the reading instruments on the commissioner's list. Each reading instrument adopted by the commissioner or a district-level committee must be based on scientific research concerning reading skills development and reading comprehension. A list of reading instruments adopted under this subsection must provide for diagnosing the reading development and comprehension of students participating in a program under Subchapter B, Chapter 29.

(b-1) The commissioner may approve an alternative reading instrument for use in diagnosing the reading development and comprehension of kindergarten students that complies with the requirements under Subsection (b).

(c) Each school district shall administer, at the first and second grade levels, a reading instrument on the list adopted by the commissioner or by the district-level committee. The district shall administer the reading instrument in accordance with the commissioner's recommendations under Subsection (a)(1).

(c-1) Each school district shall administer at the beginning of the seventh grade a reading instrument adopted by the commissioner to each student whose performance on the assessment instrument in reading administered under Section 39.023(a) to the student in grade six did not demonstrate reading proficiency, as determined by the commissioner. The district shall administer the reading instrument in accordance with the commissioner's recommendations under Subsection (a)(1).

(c-2) Each school district shall administer at the kindergarten level a reading instrument adopted by the commissioner under Subsection (b) or approved by the commissioner under Subsection (b-1). The district shall administer the reading instrument in accordance with the commissioner's recommendations under Subsection (a)(1).

(c-3) The commissioner by rule shall determine the performance on the reading instrument adopted under Subsection (b) that indicates kindergarten readiness.

(d) The superintendent of each school district shall:

(1) report to the commissioner and the board of trustees of the district the results of the reading instruments;

(2) not later than the 60th calendar day after the date on which a reading instrument was administered report, in writing, to a student's parent or guardian the student's results on the instrument; and

(3) using the school readiness certification system provided to the school district in accordance with Section 29.161(e), report electronically each student's raw score on the reading instrument to the agency for use in the school readiness certification system.

(d-1) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 4.001(a)(11), eff. September 1, 2019.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 4.001(a)(11), eff. September 1, 2019.

(f) The agency shall ensure at least one reading instrument for each grade level for which a reading instrument is required to be administered under this section is available to school districts at no cost.

(g) A school district shall notify the parent or guardian of each student in kindergarten or first or second grade who is determined, on the basis of reading instrument results, to be at risk for dyslexia or other reading difficulties. The district shall implement an accelerated reading instruction program that provides reading instruction that addresses reading deficiencies to those students and shall determine the form, content, and timing of that program. The admission, review, and dismissal committee of a student who participates in a district's special education program under Subchapter B, Chapter 29, and who does not perform satisfactorily on a reading instrument under this section shall determine the manner in which the student will participate in an accelerated reading instruction program under this subsection.

(g-1) A school district shall provide additional reading instruction and intervention to each student in seventh grade assessed under Subsection (c-1), as appropriate to improve the student's reading skills in the relevant areas identified through the assessment instrument. Training and support for activities required by this subsection shall be provided by regional education service centers and teacher literacy achievement academies established under Section 21.4552, and may be provided by other public and private providers.

(g-2) In accordance with a notification program developed by the commissioner by rule, a school district shall notify the parent or guardian of each student determined, on the basis of a screening under Section 38.003 or other basis, to have dyslexia or a related disorder, or determined, on the basis of reading instrument results, to be at risk for dyslexia or other reading difficulties, of the program maintained by the Texas State Library and Archives Commission providing students with reading disabilities the ability to borrow audiobooks free of charge.

(h) The school district shall make a good faith effort to ensure that the notice required under this section is provided either in person or by regular mail and that the notice is clear and easy to understand and is written in English and in the parent or guardian's native language.

(i) The commissioner shall certify, not later than July 1 of each school year or as soon as practicable thereafter, whether sufficient funds have been appropriated statewide for the purposes of this section. A determination by the commissioner is final and may not be appealed. For purposes of certification, the commissioner may not consider Foundation School Program funds.

(j) No more than 15 percent of the funds certified by the commissioner under Subsection (i) may be spent on indirect costs. The commissioner shall evaluate the programs that fail to meet the standard of performance under Section 39.301(c)(5) and may implement interventions or sanctions under Chapter 39A. The commissioner may audit the expenditures of funds appropriated for purposes of this section. The use of the funds appropriated for purposes of this section shall be verified as part of the district audit under Section 44.008.

(k) The provisions of this section relating to parental notification of a student's results on the reading instrument and to implementation of an accelerated reading instruction program may be implemented only if the commissioner certifies that funds have been appropriated during a school year for administering the accelerated reading instruction program specified under this section.

(l) The commissioner may adopt rules as necessary to implement this section. Section 2001.0045, Government Code, does not apply to rules adopted under this subsection.

(m) The agency by rule shall develop procedures designed to allow the agency to:

(1) effectively audit and monitor and periodically conduct site visits of all school districts to ensure that districts are complying with this section;

(2) identify any problems school districts experience in complying with this section; and

(3) develop reasonable and appropriate remedial strategies to address school district noncompliance and ensure the purposes of this section are accomplished.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 397, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 396, Sec. 2.11, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2006, 79th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 5 (H.B. 1), Sec. 3.05, eff. May 31, 2006.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1058 (H.B. 2237), Sec. 6, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1340 (S.B. 1871), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 895 (H.B. 3), Sec. 26, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1314 (S.B. 172), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 21.003(16), eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 450 (S.B. 2075), Sec. 2, eff. June 4, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 2.012, eff. June 12, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 4.001(a)(11), eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(6), eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1045 (S.B. 1267), Sec. 11, eff. June 18, 2021.

Sec. 28.0062. READING STANDARDS FOR KINDERGARTEN THROUGH THIRD GRADE. (a) Each school district and open-enrollment charter school shall:

(1) provide for the use of a phonics curriculum that uses systematic direct instruction in kindergarten through third grade to ensure all students obtain necessary early literacy skills;

(2) ensure that:

(A) not later than the 2022-2023 school year, each classroom teacher in kindergarten or first, second, or third grade and each principal at a campus with kindergarten or first, second, or third grade has attended a teacher literacy achievement academy developed under Section 21.4552; and

(B) each classroom teacher and each principal initially employed in a grade level or at a campus described by Paragraph (A) for the 2022-2023 school year or a subsequent school year has attended a teacher literacy achievement academy developed under Section 21.4552 by the end of the teacher's or principal's first year of placement in that grade level or campus; and

(3) certify to the agency that the district or school:

(A) prioritizes placement of highly effective teachers in kindergarten through second grade; and

(B) has integrated reading instruments used to diagnose reading development and comprehension to support each student in prekindergarten through third grade.

(a-1) In this subsection, "three-cueing" means a method of reading instruction for identification of words by which a student is encouraged to draw on context and sentence structure to read words without sounding the words out or using a phonics-based approach. A school district or open-enrollment charter school may not include any instruction that incorporates three-cueing in the phonics curriculum required under Subsection (a)(1).

(b) The agency shall provide assistance to school districts and open-enrollment charter schools in complying with the requirements under this section.

(c) The agency shall:

(1) monitor the implementation of this section; and

(2) periodically report to the legislature on the implementation of this section and the effectiveness of this section in improving educational outcomes.

(d) The commissioner shall establish an advisory board to assist the agency in fulfilling the agency's duties under this section. Chapter 2110, Government Code, does not apply to the advisory board.

(e) The commissioner may adopt rules to implement this section.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 2.013, eff. June 12, 2019.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 806 (H.B. 1525), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1045 (S.B. 1267), Sec. 12, eff. June 18, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 818 (H.B. 1605), Sec. 10, eff. June 13, 2023.

Sec. 28.007. MATHEMATICS DIAGNOSIS. (a) Using funds appropriated for the purpose, the commissioner shall develop and make available or contract for the development and dissemination of assessment instruments that a school district may use to diagnose student mathematics skills. In developing the assessment instruments, all assessment methods available through advanced technology, including methods using the Internet or other computer resources to provide immediate assessment of a student's skills, shall be considered.

(b) The results of assessment instruments developed under Subsection (a) may not be used for purposes of appraisals and incentives under Chapter 21 or accountability under Chapters 39 and 39A.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 834, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 21.003(17), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 28.008. ADVANCEMENT OF COLLEGE READINESS IN CURRICULUM. (a) To ensure that students are able to perform college-level course work at institutions of higher education, the commissioner of education and the commissioner of higher education shall establish vertical teams composed of public school educators and institution of higher education faculty.

(b) The vertical teams shall:

(1) recommend for approval by the commissioner of education and the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board college readiness standards and expectations that address what students must know and be able to do to succeed in entry-level courses offered at institutions of higher education;

(2) evaluate whether the high school curriculum requirements under Section 28.002 and other instructional requirements serve to prepare students to successfully perform college-level course work;

(3) recommend how the public school curriculum requirements can be aligned with college readiness standards and expectations;

(4) develop instructional strategies for teaching courses to prepare students to successfully perform college-level course work;

(5) develop or establish minimum standards for curricula, professional development materials, and online support materials in English language arts, mathematics, science, and social studies, designed for students who need additional assistance in preparing to successfully perform college-level course work; and

(6) periodically review and revise the college readiness standards and expectations developed under Subdivision (1) and recommend revised standards for approval by the commissioner of education and the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

(c) The commissioner of education and the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board by rule shall:

(1) establish the composition and duties of the vertical teams established under this section; and

(2) establish a schedule for the periodic review required under Subsection (b)(6), giving consideration to the cycle of review and identification under Section 28.002 of the essential knowledge and skills of subjects of the required curriculum.

(d) The State Board of Education shall incorporate college readiness standards and expectations approved by the commissioner of education and the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board under Subsection (b) into the essential knowledge and skills identified by the board under Section 28.002(c). The State Board of Education shall develop and by rule adopt a chart that clearly indicates the alignment of the college readiness standards and expectations with the essential knowledge and skills identified by the board under Section 28.002(c).

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the State Board of Education retains its authority under Section 28.002 concerning the required curriculum.

(g) The agency shall coordinate with the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board as necessary in administering this section.

Added by Acts 2006, 79th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 5 (H.B. 1), Sec. 5.01, eff. May 31, 2006.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1058 (H.B. 2237), Sec. 7, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1014 (H.B. 2549), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1036 (H.B. 1613), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2015.

Sec. 28.009. COLLEGE CREDIT PROGRAM. (a) Each school district shall implement a program under which students may earn the equivalent of at least 12 semester credit hours of college credit in high school. On request, a public institution of higher education in this state shall assist a school district in developing and implementing the program. The college credit may be earned through:

(1) international baccalaureate, advanced placement, or dual credit courses;

(2) articulated postsecondary courses provided for local credit or articulated postsecondary advanced technical credit courses provided for state credit; or

(3) any combination of the courses described by Subdivisions (1) and (2).

(a-1) A program implemented under this section may provide a student the opportunity to earn credit for a course or activity, including an apprenticeship or training hours:

(1) that:

(A) satisfies a requirement necessary to obtain an industry-recognized credential or certificate or an associate degree; and

(B) is approved by the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board; and

(2) for which a student may earn credit concurrently toward both the student's high school diploma and postsecondary academic requirements.

(a-2) A school district is not required to pay a student's tuition or other associated costs for taking a course under this section.

(a-4) A dual credit course offered under this section must be:

(1) in the core curriculum of the public institution of higher education providing college credit;

(2) a career and technical education course; or

(3) a foreign language course.

(a-5) Subsection (a-4) does not apply to a dual credit course offered as part of the early college education program established under Section 29.908 or any other early college program that assists a student in earning a certificate or an associate degree while in high school.

Text of subsection as amended by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 90 (H.B. 505), Sec. 1

(b) The agency shall coordinate with the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board as necessary in administering this section. The commissioner may adopt rules as necessary concerning the duties under this section of a school district. The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board may adopt rules as necessary concerning the duties under this section of a public institution of higher education. A rule may not limit:

(1) the number of dual credit courses or hours in which a student may enroll while in high school;

(2) the number of dual credit courses or hours in which a student may enroll each semester or academic year; or

(3) the grade levels at which a high school student may be eligible to enroll in a dual credit course.

Text of subsection as amended by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 988 (H.B. 18), Sec. 2

(b) The agency shall coordinate with the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board as necessary in administering this section. The commissioner may adopt rules as necessary concerning the duties under this section of a school district. The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board may adopt rules as necessary concerning the duties under this section of a public institution of higher education. A rule may not limit the number of dual credit courses or semester credit hours in which a student may enroll while in high school or limit the number of dual credit courses or semester credit hours in which a student may enroll each semester or academic year.

(b-1) The agency and the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board jointly shall develop statewide goals for dual credit programs, including early college high school programs, career and technical education dual credit programs, and joint high school and college credit programs provided under Section 130.008, to provide uniform standards for evaluating those programs. The goals must address, at a minimum:

(1) a dual credit program's achievement of enrollment in and acceleration through postsecondary education;

(2) performance in college-level coursework; and

(3) the development of an effective bridge between secondary and postsecondary education in the state.

(b-2) Any agreement, including a memorandum of understanding or articulation agreement, between a school district and public institution of higher education to provide a dual credit program described by Subsection (b-1) must:

(1) include specific program goals aligned with the statewide goals developed under Subsection (b-1);

(2) establish common advising strategies and terminology related to dual credit and college readiness;

(3) provide for the alignment of endorsements described by Section 28.025(c-1) offered by the district, and dual credit courses offered under the agreement that apply towards those endorsements, with postsecondary pathways and credentials at the institution and industry certifications;

(4) identify tools, including tools developed by the agency, the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board, or the Texas Workforce Commission, to assist school counselors, students, and families in selecting endorsements offered by the district and dual credit courses offered under the agreement;

(5) establish, or provide a procedure for establishing, the course credits that may be earned under the agreement, including by developing a course equivalency crosswalk or other method for equating high school courses with college courses and identifying the number of credits that may be earned for each course completed through the program;

(6) describe the academic supports and, if applicable, guidance that will be provided to students participating in the program;

(7) establish the district's and the institution's respective roles and responsibilities in providing the program and ensuring the quality and instructional rigor of the program;

(8) state the sources of funding for courses offered under the program, including, at a minimum, the sources of funding for tuition, transportation, and any required fees or textbooks for students participating in the program;

(9) require the district and the institution to consider the use of free or low-cost open educational resources in courses offered under the program;

(10) ensure the accurate and timely exchange of information necessary for an eligible student to enroll at no cost in a dual credit course as provided by Section 28.0095;

(11) be posted each year on the district's and the institution's respective Internet websites; and

(12) designate at least one employee of the district or institution as responsible for providing academic advising to a student who enrolls in a dual credit course under the program before the student begins the course.

(b-3) The agency and the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board shall coordinate as necessary to adopt rules for the implementation of Subsections (a-4) and (a-5). In adopting those rules, the agency and the coordinating board shall use the negotiated rulemaking procedures under Chapter 2008, Government Code, and consult with relevant stakeholders.

(c) The commissioner and the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board shall share data as necessary to enable school districts to comply with this subsection. Each school district shall annually report to the agency:

(1) the number of district students, including career and technical students, who have participated in the program and earned college credit; and

(2) the cumulative number of courses in which participating district students have enrolled and college credit hours the students have earned.

(c-1) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board shall collect student course credit data from public institutions of higher education as necessary for purposes of Subsection (c).

(d) In this section:

(1) "Career and technical student" means:

(A) a secondary education student who has entered the first course in a sequence of two or more technical courses for three or more credits in a career and technical education program; or

(B) a student who:

(i) is enrolled in an academic or workforce course that is part of a sequence of courses leading to an industry-recognized credential, certificate, or degree; and

(ii) has declared that sequence of courses as the student's major course of study.

(2) "Sequence of courses" means career and technical education courses approved by the State Board of Education or innovative courses approved by the State Board of Education that are provided for local credit.

Added by Acts 2006, 79th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 5 (H.B. 1), Sec. 5.01, eff. May 31, 2006.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 763 (H.B. 3485), Sec. 2, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1328 (H.B. 3646), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 369 (S.B. 149), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 369 (S.B. 149), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 369 (S.B. 149), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 369 (S.B. 149), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1104 (S.B. 1619), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 213 (H.B. 842), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 424 (S.B. 435), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 90 (H.B. 505), Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 988 (H.B. 18), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 93 (H.B. 1638), Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 189 (S.B. 22), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 729 (S.B. 1091), Sec. 1, eff. June 12, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 264 (S.B. 1276), Sec. 1, eff. May 28, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(6), eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 901 (H.B. 3650), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 185 (S.B. 1277), Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 5.007, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 2, eff. June 9, 2023.

Sec. 28.0095. FINANCIAL AID FOR SWIFT TRANSFER (FAST) PROGRAM. (a) In this section:

(1) "Charter school" means a charter school operating under Chapter 12.

(2) "Coordinating board" means the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

(3) "Dual credit course" includes a course offered for joint high school and junior college credit under Section 130.008 or another course offered by an institution of higher education for which a high school student may earn credit toward satisfaction of:

(A) a requirement necessary to obtain an industry-recognized credential or certificate or an associate degree;

(B) a foreign language requirement at an institution of higher education;

(C) a requirement in the core curriculum, as that term is defined by Section 61.821, at an institution of higher education; or

(D) a requirement in a field of study curriculum developed by the coordinating board under Section 61.823.

(4) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(b) The agency and the coordinating board shall jointly establish the Financial Aid for Swift Transfer (FAST) program to allow eligible students to enroll at no cost to the student in dual credit courses at participating institutions of higher education.

(c) A student is eligible to enroll at no cost in a dual credit course under the program if the student:

(1) is enrolled:

(A) in high school in a school district or charter school; and

(B) in a dual credit course at a participating institution of higher education; and

(2) was educationally disadvantaged at any time during the four school years preceding the student's enrollment in the dual credit course described by Subdivision (1)(B).

(d) An institution of higher education is eligible to participate in the program only if the institution charges for each dual credit course offered by the institution an amount of tuition that does not exceed the amount prescribed by coordinating board rule.

(e) Each school district or charter school shall:

(1) on a high school student's enrollment in a dual credit course, determine whether the student meets the criteria for the program under Subsection (c)(2); and

(2) notify the institution of higher education that offers the dual credit course in which the student is enrolled of the district's or school's determination under Subdivision (1).

(f) A school district or charter school may make the determination under Subsection (e)(1) based on the district's or school's records, the agency's records, or any other method authorized by commissioner or coordinating board rule. If the district or school bases the determination on a method other than the agency's records, the district or school shall report the method used and the data on which the method is based to the agency for purposes of verification.

(g) At least once each year, a participating institution of higher education shall certify to the agency and the coordinating board the student's eligibility for the program. Notwithstanding Section 54.051, a participating institution of higher education may not charge tuition or fees for the enrollment in a dual credit course at the institution of a student for whom the institution receives notice under Subsection (e)(2).

(h) The coordinating board shall distribute money transferred to the coordinating board under Section 48.308 to the participating institutions of higher education in proportion to the number of dual credit courses in which eligible students are enrolled at the institution.

(i) The commissioner and the commissioner of higher education shall coordinate as necessary to:

(1) confirm an eligible student's enrollment in a participating institution of higher education; and

(2) obtain or share data necessary to verify a student's eligibility under Subsection (c)(2).

(j) The commissioner and the coordinating board shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this section. Notwithstanding Section 61.033, the coordinating board is not required to use negotiated rulemaking procedures under Chapter 2008, Government Code, for the adoption of rules under this section.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 3, eff. June 9, 2023.

Sec. 28.010. NOTIFICATION REGARDING COLLEGE CREDIT AND WORK-BASED EDUCATION PROGRAMS. (a) Each school year, a school district shall notify the parent of each district student enrolled in grade nine or above of:

(1) the availability of:

(A) programs in the district under which a student may earn college credit, including advanced placement programs, dual credit programs, joint high school and college credit programs, and international baccalaureate programs;

(B) career and technology education programs or other work-based education programs in the district, including any internship, externship, or apprenticeship programs or a P-TECH program under Subchapter N, Chapter 29;

(C) subsidies based on financial need available for fees paid to take college advanced placement tests or international baccalaureate examinations under Section 28.054; and

(D) funding for enrollment in dual credit courses under Section 28.0095; and

(2) the qualifications for:

(A) enrolling in programs described by Subdivision (1)(A) or (B); or

(B) funding described by Subdivision (1)(D).

(b) A school district may provide the notification required by this section on the district's Internet website. The notification must include the name and contact information of any public or private entity offering a program described by this section in the district.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 973 (S.B. 282), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 600 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 600 (S.B. 1095), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 4, eff. June 9, 2023.

Section effective beginning with the 2009-2010 school year.

Sec. 28.011. ELECTIVE COURSES ON THE BIBLE'S HEBREW SCRIPTURES (OLD TESTAMENT) AND NEW TESTAMENT AND THEIR IMPACT ON THE HISTORY AND LITERATURE OF WESTERN CIVILIZATION. (a) A school district may offer to students in grade six or above:

(1) an elective course on the Hebrew Scriptures (Old Testament) and its impact and an elective course on the New Testament and its impact; or

(2) an elective course that combines the courses described by Subdivision (1).

(b) The purpose of a course under this section is to:

(1) teach students knowledge of biblical content, characters, poetry, and narratives that are prerequisites to understanding contemporary society and culture, including literature, art, music, mores, oratory, and public policy; and

(2) familiarize students with, as applicable:

(A) the contents of the Hebrew Scriptures or New Testament;

(B) the history of the Hebrew Scriptures or New Testament;

(C) the literary style and structure of the Hebrew Scriptures or New Testament; and

(D) the influence of the Hebrew Scriptures or New Testament on law, history, government, literature, art, music, customs, morals, values, and culture.

(c) A student may not be required to use a specific translation as the sole text of the Hebrew Scriptures or New Testament and may use as the basic instructional material a different translation of the Hebrew Scriptures or New Testament from that chosen by the board of trustees of the student's school district or the student's teacher.

(d) A course offered under this section shall follow applicable law and all federal and state guidelines in maintaining religious neutrality and accommodating the diverse religious views, traditions, and perspectives of students in their school district. A course under this section shall not endorse, favor, or promote, or disfavor or show hostility toward, any particular religion or nonreligious faith or religious perspective. Nothing in this statute is intended to violate any provision of the United States Constitution or federal law, the Texas Constitution or any state law, or any rules or guidelines provided by the United States Department of Education or the Texas Education Agency.

(e) Before adopting rules identifying the essential knowledge and skills of a course offered under this section, the State Board of Education shall submit the proposed essential knowledge and skills to the attorney general. The attorney general shall review the proposed essential knowledge and skills to ensure that the course complies with the First Amendment to the United States Constitution, and the board may not adopt rules identifying the essential knowledge and skills of a course offered under this section without the attorney general's approval under this subsection.

(f) A teacher of a course offered under this section must hold a certificate in language arts, social studies, or history that qualifies the teacher to teach at the grade level at which the course is offered with, where practical, a minor in religion or biblical studies. A teacher selected to teach a course under this section shall successfully complete staff development training outlined in Section 21.459. A course under this section may be taught only by a teacher who has successfully completed training under Section 21.459.

(g) For the purpose of a student earning credit for high school graduation, a school district shall grant one-half academic elective credit for satisfactory completion of a course on the Hebrew Scriptures, one-half academic elective credit for satisfactory completion of a course on the New Testament, and one-half academic elective credit for satisfactory completion of a combined course on both the Hebrew Scriptures and the New Testament. This subsection applies only to a course that is taught in strict compliance with this section.

(h) If, for a particular semester, fewer than 15 students at a school district campus register to enroll in a course required by this section, the district is not required to offer the course at that campus for that semester.

(i) This section does not prohibit the board of trustees of a school district from offering an elective course based on the books of a religion other than Christianity. In determining whether to offer such a course, the board may consider various factors, including student and parent demand for such a course and the impact such books have had on history and culture.

(j) This section does not prohibit a school district from offering a course, other than the course authorized by this section, in the academic study of the Hebrew Scriptures, the New Testament, or both for local credit or for state elective credit towards high school graduation.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 856 (H.B. 1287), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 6 (S.B. 6), Sec. 16, eff. July 19, 2011.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 705 (H.B. 2681), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2021.

Sec. 28.012. INSTRUCTION ON INTERACTION WITH LAW ENFORCEMENT. (a) In this section:

(1) "Board" means the State Board of Education.

(2) "Commission" means the Texas Commission on Law Enforcement.

(3) "Driver training provider" has the meaning assigned by Section 1001.001.

(b) The board and the commission shall enter into a memorandum of understanding that establishes each agency's respective responsibilities in developing instruction, including curriculum and instructional modules, on proper interaction with peace officers during traffic stops and other in-person encounters. The instruction must include information regarding:

(1) the role of law enforcement and the duties and responsibilities of peace officers;

(2) a person's rights concerning interactions with peace officers;

(3) proper behavior for civilians and peace officers during interactions;

(4) laws regarding questioning and detention by peace officers, including any law requiring a person to present proof of identity to a peace officer, and the consequences for a person's or officer's failure to comply with those laws; and

(5) how and where to file a complaint against or a compliment on behalf of a peace officer.

(c) In developing the instruction under this section, the board and the commission may consult with any interested party, including a volunteer work group convened for the purpose of making recommendations regarding the instruction.

(d) Before finalizing any instruction under this section, the board and the commission shall provide a reasonable period for public comment.

(e) Subject to rules adopted by the board, a school district or open-enrollment charter school may tailor the instruction developed under this section as appropriate for the district's or school's community. In tailoring the instruction, the district or school shall solicit input from local law enforcement agencies, driver training providers, and the community.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 513 (S.B. 30), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 663 (H.B. 1560), Sec. 5.59, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 663 (H.B. 1560), Sec. 5.60, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 28.013. NATURE SCIENCE CURRICULUM PROJECT. (a) The State Board of Education shall assist in developing a nature science curriculum, in accordance with this section, the following entities, acting jointly:

(1) the Outdoor School at Texas Tech University Center at Junction;

(2) the Texas Science, Technology, Engineering, and Math (T-STEM) Center of Texas Tech University; and

(3) South Llano River State Park.

(b) The nature science curriculum must:

(1) be designed for instruction of students in grades six through 12;

(2) provide for grade-level appropriate instruction in essential knowledge and skills identified by the State Board of Education under Section 28.002 for:

(A) science; and

(B) mathematics, social studies, and language arts, to the extent practicable and relevant to nature science studies;

(3) through participation in outdoor experiential learning projects in state parks, provide for the scientific study by students of:

(A) conservation, wildlife or aquatic biology, range ecology, or other areas of nature science; and

(B) problems affecting nature, such as threats to the watershed, and possible solutions to those problems; and

(4) be designed to:

(A) be capable of implementation in any state park;

(B) use state park resources in providing instruction; and

(C) be presented by classroom teachers and state park employees.

(c) The Texas Science, Technology, Engineering, and Math (T-STEM) Center of Texas Tech University shall make the nature science curriculum available through the university's Internet website or through a separate Internet website developed by the center for that purpose.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1045 (S.B. 1267), Sec. 24(8), eff. June 18, 2021.

(e) The nature science curriculum project must be implemented and maintained using money appropriated for those purposes.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 300 (H.B. 1700), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1045 (S.B. 1267), Sec. 24(8), eff. June 18, 2021.

Sec. 28.014. COLLEGE PREPARATORY COURSES. (a) Each school district shall partner with at least one institution of higher education to develop and provide courses in college preparatory mathematics and English language arts. The courses must be designed:

(1) for students at the 12th grade level whose performance on:

(A) an end-of-course assessment instrument required under Section 39.023(c) does not meet college readiness standards; or

(B) coursework, a college entrance examination, or an assessment instrument designated under Section 51.334 indicates that the student is not ready to perform entry-level college coursework; and

(2) to prepare students for success in entry-level college courses.

(b) A course developed under this section must be provided:

(1) on the campus of the high school offering the course; or

(2) through distance learning or as an online course provided through an institution of higher education with which the school district partners as provided by Subsection (a).

(c) Appropriate faculty of each high school offering courses under this section and appropriate faculty of each institution of higher education with which the school district partners shall meet regularly as necessary to ensure that each course is aligned with college readiness expectations. The commissioner of education, in coordination with the commissioner of higher education, may adopt rules to administer this subsection.

(d) Each school district shall provide a notice to each district student to whom Subsection (a) applies and the student's parent or guardian regarding the benefits of enrolling in a course under this section.

(e) A student who successfully completes an English language arts course developed under this section may use the credit earned in the course toward satisfying the advanced English language arts curriculum requirement for the foundation high school program under Section 28.025(b-1)(1). A student who successfully completes a mathematics course developed under this section may use the credit earned in the course toward satisfying an advanced mathematics curriculum requirement under Section 28.025 after completion of the mathematics curriculum requirements for the foundation high school program under Section 28.025(b-1)(2).

(f) A course provided under this section may be offered for dual credit at the discretion of the institution of higher education with which a school district partners under this section.

(g) Each school district, in consultation with each institution of higher education with which the district partners, shall develop or purchase instructional materials for a course developed under this section consistent with Chapter 31. The instructional materials must include technology resources that enhance the effectiveness of the course and draw on established best practices.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1058 (H.B. 2237), Sec. 8(a), eff. June 15, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 895 (H.B. 3), Sec. 27, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 10(a), eff. June 10, 2013.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 842 (H.B. 2223), Sec. 2.01, eff. June 15, 2017.

Sec. 28.016. INSTRUCTION IN HIGH SCHOOL, COLLEGE, AND CAREER PREPARATION. (a) Each school district shall provide instruction to students in grade seven or eight in preparing for high school, college, and a career.

(b) The instruction must include information regarding:

(1) the creation of a high school personal graduation plan under Section 28.02121;

(2) the distinguished level of achievement described by Section 28.025(b-15);

(3) each endorsement described by Section 28.025(c-1);

(4) college readiness standards; and

(5) potential career choices and the education needed to enter those careers.

(c) A school district may:

(1) provide the instruction as part of an existing course in the required curriculum;

(2) provide the instruction as part of an existing career and technology course designated by the State Board of Education as appropriate for that purpose; or

(3) establish a new elective course through which to provide the instruction.

(d) Each school district shall ensure that at least once in grade seven or eight each student receives the instruction under this section.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 988 (H.B. 18), Sec. 4, eff. June 19, 2015.

See note following this section.

Sec. 28.017. INSTRUCTION ON PREVENTION OF SEXUAL ABUSE AND SEX TRAFFICKING. (a) The commissioner, in cooperation with the human trafficking prevention task force created under Section 402.035, Government Code, and any other persons the commissioner considers appropriate, shall develop one or more sexual abuse and sex trafficking instructional modules that a school district may use in the district's health curriculum. The modules may include:

(1) information on the different forms of sexual abuse and assault, sex trafficking, and risk factors for sex trafficking;

(2) the procedures for reporting sexual abuse and sex trafficking or suspected sexual abuse or sex trafficking;

(3) strategies for sexual abuse and assault prevention and overcoming peer pressure;

(4) information on establishing healthy boundaries for relationships, recognizing potentially abusive or harmful relationships, and avoiding high-risk activities;

(5) the recruiting tactics of sex traffickers and peer recruiters, including recruitment through the Internet;

(6) the legal aspects of sexual abuse and sex trafficking under state and federal law; and

(7) the influence of culture and mass media on perceptions of sexual abuse and sex trafficking, including stereotypes and myths about victims and abusers, victim blaming, and the role of language.

(b) The module or modules developed under Subsection (a) must emphasize compassion for victims of sexual abuse or sex trafficking and the creation of a positive reentry experience for survivors of sexual abuse or sex trafficking into schools.

(c) Before the beginning of each school year, a school district that elects to use a module developed under Subsection (a) in the district's health curriculum shall provide written notice to the parent of each student enrolled in the district that includes the following:

(1) a statement that the district will provide instruction relating to sexual abuse and sex trafficking awareness to students enrolled in the district;

(2) a description of the material that will be used in providing instruction to students; and

(3) a statement that the parent has the right to review the material and remove the parent's student from the instruction.

(d) If a school district does not comply with the requirements of Subsection (c), a parent of a student enrolled in the district may file a complaint in accordance with the district's grievance procedure developed under Section 26.011.

Text of section effective on June 12, 2017, but only if a specific appropriation is provided as described by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 762 (S.B. 2039), Sec. 5, which states: This Act takes effect only if a specific appropriation for the implementation of the Act is provided in a general appropriations act of the 85th Legislature.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 762 (S.B. 2039), Sec. 1, eff. June 12, 2017.

Sec. 28.018. ADVANCED COMPUTER SCIENCE PROGRAM. (a) The State Board of Education by rule shall develop and implement a program under which:

(1) students in participating school districts may comply with the curriculum requirements for an advanced mathematics credit under Section 28.025(b-1)(2) or an advanced science credit under Section 28.025(b-1)(3) by successfully completing an advanced computer science course; and

(2) participating school districts implement rigorous standards, as developed by the State Board of Education, for advanced computer science courses that are focused on the creation and use of software and computing technologies.

(b) The commissioner shall adopt rules as necessary to administer this section.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 123 (H.B. 728), Sec. 1, eff. May 26, 2017.

Sec. 28.020. MATHEMATICS INNOVATION ZONES. (a) The commissioner may:

(1) on application of a school district or open-enrollment charter school, designate a campus of the district or school as a mathematics innovation zone; and

(2) from funds appropriated or donated for purposes of this section, award a grant to support implementation of innovative mathematics instruction at the campus in accordance with this section.

(b) A campus designated as a mathematics innovation zone must:

(1) implement with fidelity an innovative mathematics instructional program approved by the commissioner for purposes of this section that addresses the essential knowledge and skills of the mathematics curriculum required by Section 28.002;

(2) comply with objectives, metrics, and other mathematics innovation zone requirements imposed by the commissioner through rules adopted under Subsection (g); and

(3) provide all data relating to the mathematics innovation zone requested by the agency.

(c) A campus designated as a mathematics innovation zone is not subject to interventions under the state accountability system described by Section 39.107(a) or (e) for the first two years of the designation, provided that the campus implements the instructional program with fidelity and complies with each mathematics innovation zone requirement to the satisfaction of the commissioner. The period that a campus is exempt from interventions as provided by this subsection is not:

(1) included in calculating consecutive school years under Section 39.107(a) or (e); or

(2) considered a break in consecutive school years of unacceptable ratings for purposes of determining the need for intervention under Section 39.107(a) or (e).

(d) The commissioner may revoke designation of a campus as a mathematics innovation zone and suspend associated grant funding if the commissioner determines that the campus has failed to implement the instructional program with fidelity or comply with any requirement imposed under this section.

(e) A school district or open-enrollment charter school may use a pay for success program approved by the commissioner under Section 44.904 to pay costs associated with designation of a campus as a mathematics innovation zone.

(f) The commissioner may accept gifts, grants, or donations from any public or private source for purposes of this section.

(g) The commissioner may adopt rules as necessary to administer this section.

(h) A decision or determination by the commissioner under this section is final and may not be appealed.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 424 (S.B. 1318), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER B. ADVANCEMENT, PLACEMENT, CREDIT, AND ACADEMIC ACHIEVEMENT RECORD

Sec. 28.021. STUDENT ADVANCEMENT. (a) A student may be promoted only on the basis of academic achievement or demonstrated proficiency of the subject matter of the course or grade level.

(b) In measuring the academic achievement or proficiency of a student who is dyslexic, the student's potential for achievement or proficiency in the area must be considered.

(c) In determining promotion under Subsection (a), a school district shall consider:

(1) the recommendation of the student's teacher;

(2) the student's grade in each subject or course;

(3) the student's score on an assessment instrument administered under Section 39.023(a), (b), or (l), to the extent applicable; and

(4) any other necessary academic information, as determined by the district.

(d) By the start of the school year, a district shall make public the requirements for student advancement under this section.

(e) The commissioner shall provide guidelines to districts based on best practices that a district may use when considering factors for promotion.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 895 (H.B. 3), Sec. 28, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 307 (H.B. 2135), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 28.0211. ACCELERATED INSTRUCTION; MODIFIED TEACHER ASSIGNMENT.

(a) To ensure that each student achieves at least satisfactory performance on each assessment instrument administered under Section 39.023, a school district shall ensure that the district's curricular and instructional systems provide instruction to all students that:

(1) is consistently aligned with the essential knowledge and skills for the applicable subject area and grade level; and

(2) strategically and timely addresses deficiencies in the prerequisite essential knowledge and skills for the applicable subject area and grade level.

(a-1) Each time a student fails to perform satisfactorily on an assessment instrument administered under Section 39.023(a) or (l) in the third, fourth, fifth, sixth, seventh, or eighth grade or an end-of-course assessment instrument administered under Section 39.023(c), other than an assessment instrument developed or adopted based on alternative academic achievement standards, the school district in which the student attends school shall provide to the student accelerated instruction in the applicable subject area during the subsequent summer or school year and, subject to Subsections (a-7) and (a-8), either:

(1) allow the student to be assigned a classroom teacher who is certified as a master, exemplary, or recognized teacher under Section 21.3521 for the subsequent school year in the applicable subject area; or

(2) provide the student supplemental instruction under Subsection (a-4).

(a-2) Accelerated instruction provided during the following school year under Subsection (a-1) may require participation of the student before or after normal school hours.

(a-3) In providing accelerated instruction under Subsection (a-1), a district may not remove a student, except under circumstances for which a student enrolled in the same grade level who is not receiving accelerated instruction would be removed, from:

(1) instruction in the foundation curriculum and enrichment curriculum adopted under Section 28.002 for the grade level in which the student is enrolled; or

(2) recess or other physical activity that is available to other students enrolled in the same grade level.

(a-4) If a district receives funding under Section 29.0881 or 48.104, the Coronavirus Response and Relief Supplemental Appropriations Act, 2021 (Div. M, Pub. L. No. 116-260), or the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (Pub. L. No. 117-2), then supplemental instruction provided by a school district under Subsection (a-1)(2) must:

(1) include targeted instruction in the essential knowledge and skills for the applicable grade levels and subject area;

(2) be provided in addition to instruction normally provided to students in the grade level in which the student is enrolled;

(3) be provided during the subsequent summer or school year:

(A) to each student for no less than:

(i) 15 hours; or

(ii) 30 hours for a student whose performance on the applicable assessment instrument was significantly below satisfactory, as defined by commissioner rule; and

(B) unless the instruction is provided to a student fully during summer, no less than once per week during the school year, except as otherwise provided by commissioner rule to account for school holidays or shortened school weeks;

(4) be designed to assist the student in achieving satisfactory performance in the applicable grade level and subject area;

(5) include effective instructional materials designed for supplemental instruction;

(6) be provided to a student individually or in a group of no more than four students, unless the parent or guardian of each student in the group authorizes a larger group;

(7) be provided by a person with training in the applicable instructional materials for the supplemental instruction and under the oversight of the school district; and

(8) to the extent possible, be provided by one person for the entirety of the student's supplemental instruction period.

(a-5) Each school district shall establish a process allowing for the parent or guardian of a student who fails to perform satisfactorily on an assessment instrument specified under Subsection (a-1) to make a request for district consideration that the student be assigned to a particular classroom teacher in the applicable subject area for the subsequent school year, if more than one classroom teacher is available.

(a-6) The commissioner shall provide guidelines to school districts on research-based best practices and effective strategies that a district may use in developing an accelerated instruction program and shall provide resources to districts to assist in the provision of an accelerated instruction program.

(a-7) The requirements under Subsection (a-1)(1) or (2) do not apply to a student who is retained at a grade level for the school year in which those requirements would otherwise apply.

(a-8) A school district may not be required to provide supplemental instruction under Subsection (a-1)(2) to a student in more than two subject areas per school year. If the district would otherwise be required to provide supplemental instruction to a student in more than two subject areas for a school year, the district shall prioritize providing supplemental instruction to the student in mathematics and reading, or Algebra I, English I, or English II, as applicable, for that school year.

(a-9) A parent or guardian of a student to whom supplemental instruction will be provided under Subsection (a-1)(2) and who either was administered and failed to perform satisfactorily on an assessment instrument specified under Subsection (a-1) or was administered a beginning-of-year assessment instrument aligned with the essential knowledge and skills for the applicable subject area, including a student to whom Subsection (b) applies, may elect to modify or remove a requirement for that instruction under Subsection (a-4) by submitting a written request to an administrator of the campus at which the student is enrolled. A school district may not encourage or direct a parent or guardian to make an election under this subsection that would allow the district to:

(1) not provide supplemental instruction to the student; or

(2) provide supplemental instruction in a group larger than authorized under Subsection (a-4)(6).

(a-10) A school district is not required to provide accelerated instruction under Subsection (a-1) to a student who, instead of being administered an assessment instrument specified under Subsection (a-1), was administered a substitute assessment instrument in accordance with other law or agency rule authorizing the use of the substitute assessment instrument for purposes of satisfying the requirements concerning the applicable assessment instrument under Subsection (a-1).

(a-11) The agency shall approve one or more products that use an automated, computerized, or other augmented method for providing supplemental instruction under Subsection (a-1)(2) that may be used in lieu of some or all of the individual or group instruction required under Subsection (a-4)(6), as appropriate for the applicable grade level and subject area and a student's academic deficiency. The agency may approve a product under this subsection only if evidence indicates that the product is more effective than the individual or group instruction required under Subsection (a-4)(6). The commissioner shall adopt rules regarding when a product approved under this subsection may be used and the requirements under Subsection (a-4) for which the product may be substituted.

(a-12) For the purpose of providing accelerated instruction or supplemental instruction under this section, a school district may use a service provider that is not on a list of service providers approved by the agency if the district can demonstrate to the commissioner that use of the service provider results in measurable improvement in student outcomes.

(a-13) A school district that is required to provide to a student accelerated instruction under Subsection (a-1) or supplemental instruction under Subsection (a-1)(2) is not required to provide additional instruction under either provision to the student based on the student's failure to perform satisfactorily on an assessment instrument administered as an optional assessment in the same subject area in which the district is required to provide the student the accelerated or supplemental instruction.

(a-14) A school district shall provide to the parent or guardian of a student who fails to perform satisfactorily on an assessment instrument specified under Subsection (a-1) notice that the student is not performing on grade level in the applicable subject area. Notwithstanding Subsection (h), the district must provide the notice at a parent-teacher conference or, if the district is unable to provide the notice at a parent-teacher conference, by another means. The agency shall develop and provide to school districts a model notice in plain language for use under this section.

(b) For each student who does not perform satisfactorily on an assessment instrument specified under Subsection (a-1) for two or more consecutive school years in the same subject area, the school district the student attends shall develop an accelerated education plan as described by Subsection (f).

(b-1) A school district shall make a good faith attempt to provide to the parent or guardian of a student to whom Subsection (b) applies a parent-teacher conference with the student's primary teacher at the start and end of the subsequent school year. At the conference, the district shall provide the student's parent or guardian with:

(1) the notice required under Subsection (a-14); and

(2) an explanation of:

(A) the accelerated instruction to which the student is entitled under this section; and

(B) the accelerated education plan that must be developed for the student under Subsection (f) and the manner in which the parent or guardian may participate in developing the plan.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 404 (H.B. 1416), Sec. 5(1), eff. June 9, 2023.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 910 (H.B. 4545), Sec. 10(1), eff. June 16, 2021.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 910 (H.B. 4545), Sec. 10(1), eff. June 16, 2021.

(f) Not later than the start of the subsequent school year, a school district shall develop an accelerated education plan for each student to whom Subsection (b) applies that provides the necessary accelerated instruction to enable the student to perform at the appropriate grade or course level by the conclusion of the school year. The plan:

(1) must:

(A) identify the reason the student did not perform satisfactorily on the applicable assessment instrument specified under Subsection (a-1); and

(B) notwithstanding Subsection (a-4)(3)(A), require the student to be provided with no less than 30 hours, or a greater number of hours if appropriate, of supplemental instruction under Subsection (a-4) for each consecutive school year in which the student does not perform satisfactorily on the assessment instrument in the applicable subject area specified under Subsection (a-1); and

(2) may require that, as appropriate to ensure the student performs satisfactorily on the assessment instrument in the applicable subject area specified under Subsection (a-1) at the next administration of the assessment instrument:

(A) the district expand the times in which supplemental instruction under Subsection (a-4) is available to the student;

(B) the student be assigned for the school year to a specific teacher who is better able to provide accelerated instruction; and

(C) the district provide any necessary additional resources to the student.

(f-1) The accelerated education plan under Subsection (f) must be documented in writing, and a copy must be provided to the student's parent or guardian.

(f-2) During the school year, the student shall be monitored to ensure that the student is progressing in accordance with the accelerated education plan developed under Subsection (f).

(f-3) The board of trustees of each school district shall adopt a policy consistent with the grievance procedure adopted under Section 26.011 to allow a parent to contest the content or implementation of an accelerated education plan developed under Subsection (f).

(f-4) Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 404 (H.B. 1416), Sec. 5(1), eff. June 9, 2023.

(f-5) Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 404 (H.B. 1416), Sec. 5(1), eff. June 9, 2023.

(g) This section does not preclude the retention at a grade level, in accordance with state law or school district policy, of a student who performs satisfactorily on an assessment instrument specified under Subsection (a-1).

(h) In each instance under this section in which a school district is specifically required to provide notice or a written copy to a parent or guardian of a student, the district shall make a good faith effort to ensure that such notice or copy is provided either in person or by regular mail and that the notice or copy is clear and easy to understand and is written in English or the parent or guardian's native language.

(i) The admission, review, and dismissal committee of a student who participates in a district's special education program under Subchapter A, Chapter 29, and who does not perform satisfactorily on an assessment instrument specified under Subsection (a-1) shall, at the student's next annual review meeting, review the student's participation and progress in, as applicable, accelerated instruction provided under Subsection (a), supplemental instruction provided under Subsection (a-1)(2), or an accelerated education plan developed under Subsection (f). The student's parent may request, or the district may schedule, an additional committee meeting if a committee member believes that the student's individualized education program needs to be modified based on the requirements under this section. If the district refuses to convene a committee meeting requested by the student's parent under this subsection, the district shall provide the parent with written notice explaining the reason the district refuses to convene the meeting.

(i-1) If a student who attends school in a homebound or other off-campus instructional arrangement, including at a residential treatment campus or state hospital, is unable to participate in an accelerated instruction program required under this section due to the student's condition, the school district may determine that the student be provided the accelerated instruction when the student attends school in an on-campus instructional setting. If the student's condition prevents the student from attending school in an on-campus instructional setting for the school year during which the accelerated instruction is required to be provided to the student, the district is not required to provide the accelerated instruction to the student for that school year.

(i-2) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 910 (H.B. 4545), Sec. 10(1), eff. June 16, 2021.

(j) A school district or open-enrollment charter school shall provide students required to attend accelerated programs under this section with transportation to those programs if the programs occur outside of regular school hours, unless the district or school does not operate, or contract or agree with another entity to operate, a transportation system.

(k) The commissioner may adopt rules as necessary to implement this section, including rules for required reporting necessary to support student transfers.

(l) The agency shall monitor and evaluate the effectiveness of the accelerated instruction required under this section.

(l-1) The commissioner may adopt rules requiring a school district that receives federal funding under Title I of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. Section 6301 et seq.) to use that funding to provide supplemental educational services under 20 U.S.C. Section 6316 in conjunction with the accelerated instruction provided under this section, provided that the rules may not conflict with federal law governing the use of that funding.

(m) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 910 (H.B. 4545), Sec. 10(1), eff. June 16, 2021.

(m-1) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 910 (H.B. 4545), Sec. 10(1), eff. June 16, 2021.

(n) Except as requested under Subsection (a-5) or provided by Subsection (n-1), a student for whom an accelerated education plan must be developed under Subsection (b) must be assigned, in each school year and subject covered by the accelerated education plan, to an appropriately certified teacher who meets all state and federal qualifications to teach that subject and grade.

(n-1) In a manner consistent with federal law and notwithstanding any other law, the commissioner may waive the requirement under Subsection (n) regarding the assignment of a student to an appropriately certified classroom teacher on the request of a school district.

(o) This section does not require the administration of a fifth or eighth grade assessment instrument in a subject under Section 39.023(a) to a student enrolled in the fifth or eighth grade, as applicable, if the student:

(1) is enrolled in a course in the subject intended for students above the student's grade level and will be administered an assessment instrument adopted or developed under Section 39.023(a) that aligns with the curriculum for the course in which the student is enrolled; or

(2) is enrolled in a course in the subject for which the student will receive high school academic credit and will be administered an end-of-course assessment instrument adopted under Section 39.023(c) for the course.

(p) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a student described by Subsection (o) may not be denied promotion on the basis of failure to perform satisfactorily on an assessment instrument not required to be administered to the student in accordance with that subsection.

(q) The commissioner may waive the requirements under this section regarding accelerated instruction for a school district for each school year in which at least 60 percent of the students who received accelerated instruction during the school year immediately preceding the previous school year, including at least 60 percent of students whose performance on the applicable assessment instrument was significantly below satisfactory, as defined by commissioner rule, performed satisfactorily in the previous school year on the assessment instrument in each subject in which the student previously failed to perform satisfactorily. For purposes of determining whether a school district qualifies for a waiver under this subsection, the commissioner shall:

(1) if a student received accelerated instruction in more than one subject during the applicable school year, consider the student's performance on the assessment instrument in each subject separately from the student's performance on the assessment instrument for each other subject; and

(2) by rule provide that a school district may not qualify for a waiver if students who are receiving special education services or are educationally disadvantaged are overrepresented among the students in the district who received accelerated instruction during the school year immediately preceding the previous school year and did not perform satisfactorily in the previous school year on the assessment instrument in each applicable subject.

(r) Not later than the beginning of each school year, the commissioner shall publish a list of school districts that qualify for a waiver under Subsection (q).

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 396, Sec. 2.12, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1058 (H.B. 2237), Sec. 9, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1058 (H.B. 2237), Sec. 17, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 895 (H.B. 3), Sec. 29, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 91 (S.B. 1303), Sec. 7.006, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 307 (H.B. 2135), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 11, eff. June 10, 2013.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 242 (H.B. 657), Sec. 1, eff. May 29, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 3.022, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 910 (H.B. 4545), Sec. 2, eff. June 16, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 910 (H.B. 4545), Sec. 10(1), eff. June 16, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 404 (H.B. 1416), Sec. 1, eff. June 9, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 404 (H.B. 1416), Sec. 2, eff. June 9, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 404 (H.B. 1416), Sec. 5(1), eff. June 9, 2023.

Sec. 28.0212. JUNIOR HIGH OR MIDDLE SCHOOL PERSONAL GRADUATION PLAN. (a) A principal of a junior high or middle school shall designate a school counselor, teacher, or other appropriate individual to develop and administer a personal graduation plan for each student enrolled in the junior high or middle school who:

(1) does not perform satisfactorily on an assessment instrument administered under Subchapter B, Chapter 39; or

(2) is not likely to receive a high school diploma before the fifth school year following the student's enrollment in grade level nine, as determined by the district.

(b) A personal graduation plan under this section must:

(1) identify educational goals for the student;

(2) include diagnostic information, appropriate monitoring and intervention, and other evaluation strategies;

(3) include an intensive instruction program described by Section 28.0213;

(4) address participation of the student's parent or guardian, including consideration of the parent's or guardian's educational expectations for the student; and

(5) provide innovative methods to promote the student's advancement, including flexible scheduling, alternative learning environments, on-line instruction, and other interventions that are proven to accelerate the learning process and have been scientifically validated to improve learning and cognitive ability.

(c) Notwithstanding Subsection (b), a student's individualized education program developed under Section 29.005 may be used as the student's personal graduation plan under this section.

(d) The agency shall establish minimum standards for a personal graduation plan under this section.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211, Sec. 78(b)(2), eff. September 1, 2014.

(g) Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 78(b)(2), eff. September 1, 2014.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1212, Sec. 7, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 763 (H.B. 3485), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1058 (H.B. 2237), Sec. 10, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 12(a), eff. June 10, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 13(a), eff. June 10, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 78(b)(2), eff. September 1, 2014.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 443 (S.B. 715), Sec. 19, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 28.02121. HIGH SCHOOL PERSONAL GRADUATION PLAN. (a) The agency, in consultation with the Texas Workforce Commission and the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board, shall prepare and make available to each school district in English and Spanish information that explains the advantages of the distinguished level of achievement described by Section 28.025(b-15) and each endorsement described by Section 28.025(c-1). The information must contain an explanation:

(1) concerning the benefits of choosing a high school personal graduation plan that includes the distinguished level of achievement under the foundation high school program and includes one or more endorsements to enable the student to achieve a class rank in the top 10 percent for students at the campus; and

(2) that encourages parents, to the greatest extent practicable, to have the student choose a high school personal graduation plan described by Subdivision (1).

(b) A school district shall publish the information provided to the district under Subsection (a) on the Internet website of the district and ensure that the information is available to students in grades nine and above and the parents or legal guardians of those students in the language in which the parents or legal guardians are most proficient. A district is required to provide information under this subsection in the language in which the parents or legal guardians are most proficient only if at least 20 students in a grade level primarily speak that language.

(c) A principal of a high school shall designate a school counselor or school administrator to review personal graduation plan options with each student entering grade nine together with that student's parent or guardian. The personal graduation plan options reviewed must include the distinguished level of achievement described by Section 28.025(b-15) and the endorsements described by Section 28.025(c-1). Before the conclusion of the school year, the student and the student's parent or guardian must confirm and sign a personal graduation plan for the student.

(d) A personal graduation plan under Subsection (c) must identify a course of study that:

(1) promotes:

(A) college and workforce readiness; and

(B) career placement and advancement; and

(2) facilitates the student's transition from secondary to postsecondary education.

(e) A school district may not prevent a student and the student's parent or guardian from confirming a personal graduation plan that includes pursuit of a distinguished level of achievement or an endorsement.

(f) A student may amend the student's personal graduation plan after the initial confirmation of the plan under this section. If a student amends the student's personal graduation plan, the school shall send written notice to the student's parents regarding the change.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 14(a), eff. June 10, 2013.

Sec. 28.02122. INCLUSION OF MENTAL HEALTH PROFESSIONS IN HEALTH SCIENCE CAREER INFORMATION. The agency shall ensure that any information provided to students relating to health science careers includes information regarding mental health professions. To the extent that the public services endorsement includes information on health science career pathways, the information must include mental health careers as a possible pathway.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 96 (H.B. 1430), Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 2015.

Sec. 28.02123. NOTIFICATION OF CERTAIN HIGH SCHOOL GRADUATION REQUIREMENTS. (a) Not later than September 1 of each school year, a school district shall notify by regular mail or e-mail the parent of or other person standing in parental relation to each student enrolled in grade nine or above that the student is not required to complete an Algebra II course to graduate under the foundation high school program.

(b) The notification must include information regarding the potential consequences to a student of not completing an Algebra II course, including the impact on eligibility for:

(1) automatic college admission under Section 51.803; and

(2) certain financial aid authorized under Title 3, including:

(A) the TEXAS grant program under Subchapter M, Chapter 56; and

(B) the Texas Educational Opportunity Grant Program under Subchapter P, Chapter 56.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 960 (S.B. 232), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 28.02124. PARENTAL OPTION FOR STUDENT RETENTION. (a) Subject to Subsection (c), a parent or guardian may elect for a student to:

(1) repeat prekindergarten;

(2) enroll in prekindergarten, if the student would have been eligible to enroll in prekindergarten during the previous school year under Section 29.153(b) and the student has not yet enrolled in kindergarten;

(3) repeat kindergarten;

(4) enroll in kindergarten, if the student would have been eligible to enroll in kindergarten in the previous school year and has not yet enrolled in first grade; or

(5) for grades one through eight, repeat the grade in which the student was enrolled during the previous school year.

(a-1) Subject to Subsection (c), for courses taken for high school credit, a parent or guardian may elect for a student to repeat any course in which the student was enrolled in during the previous school year. A parent or guardian may not elect for a student to repeat a course under this subsection if the school district or open-enrollment charter school determines the student has met all of the requirements for graduation.

(a-2) A parent or guardian may make an election under Subsection (a)(5) or (a-1), or both.

(b) An election made by a parent or guardian under this section shall be made in writing to a school district or open-enrollment charter school, as applicable.

(c) If a school district or an open-enrollment charter school disagrees with an election authorized under this section, the school district or open-enrollment charter school must convene a retention committee and meet with the parent or guardian to discuss retention. A meeting under this subsection shall be conducted in person unless an alternative means is agreeable to the parent or guardian. A student may not be retained for a grade or retake a course under this section if the parent or guardian does not meet with the retention committee.

(d) A retention committee established under Subsection (c) shall be composed of:

(1) the principal or the principal's designee;

(2) the student's parent or guardian;

(3) the teacher who taught the grade or course for which the parent wants the student retained or repeated; and

(4) additional teachers at the discretion of the principal, if the student will potentially repeat multiple courses.

(e) A retention committee established under Subsection (c) shall:

(1) discuss the merits of and concerns with advancement and retention; and

(2) review and consider the student's grade in each subject or course, the results of any formative or summative assessments administered to the student, and any other available academic information to determine the student's academic readiness for the next grade or a given course.

(f) If established under Subsection (c), after the parent or guardian has participated in a retention committee meeting, the parent or guardian shall decide whether the student should be retained or retake a grade or course. The school district or open-enrollment school must abide by the decision of the parent or guardian.

(g) A student who receives a passing grade or who earns credit for a high school course shall retain a school district's or open-enrollment charter school's original assignment of a grade or award of credit when a student is retained under this section, unless the school district or open-enrollment charter school adopts a policy to a different effect.

(h) Except as provided by this section or other law, retention of a student pursuant to a parent's or guardian's election under this section shall be considered the same as retention of a student by a school district or open-enrollment charter school.

(i) The rights of a parent or guardian under this section transfer to a student if the student is 18 years of age or older or has had the disabilities of a minor removed, unless the student is under a form of guardianship imposed by law or court order that continues after the student turns 18 years of age.

(j) The commissioner may adopt rules to implement this section.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 887 (S.B. 1697), Sec. 4, eff. June 16, 2021.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 867 (H.B. 3803), Sec. 1, eff. June 13, 2023.

Sec. 28.0213. INTENSIVE PROGRAM OF INSTRUCTION. (a) A school district shall offer an intensive program of instruction to a student who:

(1) does not perform satisfactorily on an assessment instrument administered under Subchapter B, Chapter 39; or

(2) is not likely to receive a high school diploma before the fifth school year following the student's enrollment in grade nine, as determined by the district.

(b) A school district shall design the intensive program of instruction described by Subsection (a) to:

(1) enable the student to:

(A) to the extent practicable, perform at the student's grade level at the conclusion of the next regular school term; or

(B) attain a standard of annual growth specified by the school district and reported by the district to the agency; and

(2) if applicable, carry out the purposes of Section 28.0211.

(c) A school district shall use funds appropriated by the legislature for an intensive program of instruction to plan and implement intensive instruction and other activities aimed at helping a student satisfy state and local high school graduation requirements. The commissioner shall distribute funds to districts that implement a program under this section based on the number of students identified by the district who:

(1) do not perform satisfactorily on an assessment instrument administered under Subchapter B, Chapter 39; or

(2) are not likely to receive a high school diploma before the fifth school year following the student's enrollment in grade nine, as determined by the district.

(d) A school district's determination of the appropriateness of a program for a student under this section is final and does not create a cause of action.

(e) For a student in a special education program under Subchapter A, Chapter 29, who does not perform satisfactorily on an assessment instrument administered under Section 39.023(a), (b), or (c), the student's admission, review, and dismissal committee shall design the program to:

(1) enable the student to attain a standard of annual growth on the basis of the student's individualized education program; and

(2) if applicable, carry out the purposes of Section 28.0211.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1212, Sec. 7, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1354 (S.B. 1404), Sec. 3, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 28.0214. FINALITY OF GRADE. (a) An examination or course grade issued by a classroom teacher is final and may not be changed unless the grade is arbitrary, erroneous, or not consistent with the school district grading policy applicable to the grade, as determined by the board of trustees of the school district in which the teacher is employed.

(b) A determination by a school district board of trustees under Subsection (a) is not subject to appeal. This subsection does not prohibit an appeal related to a student's eligibility to participate in extracurricular activities under Section 33.081.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 194, Sec. 1, effective June 2, 2003.

Renumbered from Education Code, Section 28.0212 by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 23.001(14), eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 28.0216. DISTRICT GRADING POLICY. A school district shall adopt a grading policy, including provisions for the assignment of grades on class assignments and examinations, before each school year. A district grading policy:

(1) must require a classroom teacher to assign a grade that reflects the student's relative mastery of an assignment;

(2) may not require a classroom teacher to assign a minimum grade for an assignment without regard to the student's quality of work; and

(3) may allow a student a reasonable opportunity to make up or redo a class assignment or examination for which the student received a failing grade.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 2033), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 28.022. NOTICE TO PARENT OF UNSATISFACTORY PERFORMANCE. (a) The board of trustees of each school district shall adopt a policy that:

(1) provides for a conference between parents and teachers;

(2) requires the district, at least once every 12 weeks, to give written notice to a parent of a student's performance in each class or subject; and

(3) requires the district, at least once every three weeks, or during the fourth week of each nine-week grading period, to give written notice to a parent or legal guardian of a student's performance in a subject included in the foundation curriculum under Section 28.002(a)(1) if the student's performance in the subject is consistently unsatisfactory, as determined by the district.

(b) The notice required under Subsections (a)(2) and (a)(3) must:

(1) provide for the signature of a student's parent; and

(2) be returned to the district.

(c) A policy adopted under this section does not apply to a student who:

(1) is 18 years of age or older and who is living in a different residence than the student's parents;

(2) is married; or

(3) has had the disabilities of minority removed for general purposes.

(d) In this section, "parent" includes a guardian, conservator, or other person having lawful control of a student.

(e) A district that uses an electronic platform for communicating student grade and performance information to parents may permit a parent to sign a notice required under Subsections (a)(2) and (a)(3) electronically, so long as the district retains a record verifying the parent's acknowledgment of the required notice. A district that accepts electronic signatures under this subsection must offer parents the option to provide a handwritten signature as provided under Subsection (b).

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1237, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 166 (H.B. 1993), Sec. 1, eff. May 28, 2015.

Sec. 28.023. CREDIT BY EXAMINATION. (a) Using guidelines established by the State Board of Education, a school district shall develop or select for review by the district board of trustees examinations for acceleration for each primary school grade level and for credit for secondary school academic subjects. The guidelines must provide for the examinations to thoroughly test comprehension of the information presented in the applicable grade level or subject. The board of trustees shall approve for each subject, to the extent available, at least four examinations that satisfy State Board of Education guidelines. The examinations approved by the board of trustees must include:

(1) advanced placement examinations developed by the College Board; and

(2) examinations administered through the College-Level Examination Program.

(b) A school district shall give a student in a primary grade level credit for a grade level and advance the student one grade level on the basis of an examination for acceleration approved by the board of trustees under Subsection (a) if:

(1) the student scores in the 80th percentile or above on each section of the examination;

(2) a district representative recommends that the student be advanced; and

(3) the student's parent or guardian gives written approval of the advancement.

(c) A school district shall give a student in grade level six or above credit for a subject on the basis of an examination for credit in the subject approved by the board of trustees under Subsection (a) if the student scores in the 80th percentile or above on the examination or if the student achieves a score as provided by Subsection (c-1). If a student is given credit in a subject on the basis of an examination, the district shall enter the examination score on the student's transcript and the student is not required to take an end-of-course assessment instrument adopted under Section 39.023(c) for that subject.

(c-1) A school district shall give a student in grade level six or above credit for a subject if the student scores:

(1) a three or higher on an advanced placement examination approved by the board of trustees under Subsection (a) and developed by the College Board; or

(2) a scaled score of 50 or higher on an examination approved by the board of trustees under Subsection (a) and administered through the College-Level Examination Program.

(d) Each district shall administer each examination approved by the board of trustees under Subsection (a) not fewer than four times each year, at times to be determined by the State Board of Education.

(e) Subsection (d) does not apply to an examination that has an administration date that is established by an entity other than the school district.

(f) A student may not attempt more than two times to receive credit for a particular subject on the basis of an examination for credit in that subject.

(g) If a student fails to achieve the designated score described by Subsection (c) or (c-1) on an applicable examination described by Subsection (c) or (c-1) for a subject before the beginning of the school year in which the student would ordinarily be required to enroll in a course in that subject in accordance with the school district's prescribed course sequence, the student must satisfactorily complete the course to receive credit for the course.

(h) This subsection applies only to a school district surrounded by a school district described by Section 11.065(a). Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a school district's board of trustees may establish a minimum required score for each section of an examination for acceleration or an examination for credit approved by the board under Subsection (a) that is higher than the minimum required scores under Subsections (b) and (c), respectively. A minimum required score established by a board of trustees under this subsection:

(1) may be no greater than a score in the 90th percentile;

(2) must be established before the beginning of a school year for examinations to be administered in the school year; and

(3) must apply for at least the entire school year.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1029 (H.B. 2694), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1203 (S.B. 1365), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (S.B. 453), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 813 (H.B. 789), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2017.

Sec. 28.024. CREDIT FOR ENROLLMENT IN CERTAIN ACADEMIES. A school district shall grant to a student credit toward the academic course requirements for high school graduation, up to a maximum of two years of credit, for courses the student successfully completes at:

(1) the Texas Academy of Leadership in the Humanities under Section 96.707;

(2) the Texas Academy of Mathematics and Science under Subchapter G, Chapter 105;

(3) the Texas Academy of Mathematics and Science under Section 78.10; or

(4) the Texas Academy of International Studies under Section 87.505.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 887 (S.B. 1452), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1339 (S.B. 151), Sec. 7, eff. June 18, 2005.

Reenacted and amended by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 4.004, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 28.025. HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA AND CERTIFICATE; ACADEMIC ACHIEVEMENT RECORD. (a) The State Board of Education by rule shall determine curriculum requirements for the foundation high school program that are consistent with the required curriculum under Section 28.002. The State Board of Education shall designate the specific courses in the foundation curriculum under Section 28.002(a)(1) required under the foundation high school program. Except as provided by this section, the State Board of Education may not designate a specific course or a specific number of credits in the enrichment curriculum as requirements for the program.

(b) A school district shall ensure that each student, on entering ninth grade, indicates in writing an endorsement under Subsection (c-1) that the student intends to earn. A district shall permit a student to choose, at any time, to earn an endorsement other than the endorsement the student previously indicated. A student may graduate under the foundation high school program without earning an endorsement if, after the student's sophomore year:

(1) the student and the student's parent or person standing in parental relation to the student are advised by a school counselor of the specific benefits of graduating from high school with one or more endorsements; and

(2) the student's parent or person standing in parental relation to the student files with a school counselor written permission, on a form adopted by the agency, allowing the student to graduate under the foundation high school program without earning an endorsement.

(b-1) The State Board of Education by rule shall require that the curriculum requirements for the foundation high school program under Subsection (a) include a requirement that students successfully complete:

(1) four credits in English language arts under Section 28.002(a)(1)(A), including one credit in English I, one credit in English II, one credit in English III, and one credit in an advanced English course authorized under Subsection (b-2);

(2) three credits in mathematics under Section 28.002(a)(1)(B), including one credit in Algebra I, one credit in geometry, and one credit in any advanced mathematics course authorized under Subsection (b-2);

(3) three credits in science under Section 28.002(a)(1)(C), including one credit in biology, one credit in any advanced science course authorized under Subsection (b-2), and one credit in integrated physics and chemistry or in an additional advanced science course authorized under Subsection (b-2);

(4) three credits in social studies under Section 28.002(a)(1)(D), including one credit in United States history, at least one-half credit in government and at least one-half credit in economics or personal financial literacy & economics, and one credit in world geography or world history;

(5) except as provided under Subsections (b-12), (b-13), and (b-14), two credits in the same language in a language other than English under Section 28.002(a)(2)(A);

(6) five elective credits;

(7) one credit in fine arts under Section 28.002(a)(2)(D); and

(8) except as provided by Subsection (b-11), one credit in physical education under Section 28.002(a)(2)(C).

(b-2) In adopting rules under Subsection (b-1), the State Board of Education shall:

(1) provide for a student to comply with the curriculum requirements for an advanced English course under Subsection (b-1)(1), for an advanced mathematics course under Subsection (b-1)(2), and for any advanced science course under Subsection (b-1)(3) by successfully completing a course in the appropriate content area that has been approved as an advanced course by board rule or that is offered as an advanced course for credit without board approval as provided by Section 28.002(g-1); and

(2) allow a student to comply with the curriculum requirements for the third and fourth mathematics credits under Subsection (b-1)(2) or the third and fourth science credits under Subsection (b-1)(3) by successfully completing an advanced career and technical course designated by the State Board of Education as containing substantively similar and rigorous academic content.

(b-3) In adopting rules for purposes of Subsection (b-2), the State Board of Education must approve a variety of advanced English, mathematics, and science courses that may be taken to comply with the foundation high school program requirements, provided that each approved course prepares students to enter the workforce successfully or postsecondary education without remediation.

(b-4) A school district may offer the curriculum described in Subsections (b-1)(1) through (4) in an applied manner. Courses delivered in an applied manner must cover the essential knowledge and skills, and the student shall be administered the applicable end-of-course assessment instrument as provided by Sections 39.023(c) and 39.025.

(b-5) A school district may offer a mathematics or science course to be taken by a student after completion of Algebra II and physics. A course approved under this subsection must be endorsed by an institution of higher education as a course for which the institution would award course credit or as a prerequisite for a course for which the institution would award course credit.

(b-6) A school district may allow a student to enroll concurrently in Algebra I and geometry.

(b-7) The State Board of Education, in coordination with the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board, shall adopt rules to ensure that a student may comply with the curriculum requirements under the foundation high school program or for an endorsement under Subsection (c-1) by successfully completing appropriate courses in the core curriculum of an institution of higher education under Section 61.822. Notwithstanding Subsection (b-15) or (c) of this section, Section 39.025, or any other provision of this code and notwithstanding any school district policy, a student who has completed the core curriculum of an institution of higher education under Section 61.822, as certified by the institution in accordance with commissioner rule, is considered to have earned a distinguished level of achievement under the foundation high school program and is entitled to receive a high school diploma from the appropriate high school as that high school is determined in accordance with commissioner rule. A student who is considered to have earned a distinguished level of achievement under the foundation high school program under this subsection may apply for admission to an institution of higher education for the first semester or other academic term after the semester or other academic term in which the student completes the core curriculum.

(b-8) Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211, Sec. 78(b)(3), eff. September 1, 2014.

(b-9) A school district, with the approval of the commissioner, may allow a student to satisfy the fine arts credit required under Subsection (b-1)(7) by participating in a community-based fine arts program not provided by the school district in which the student is enrolled. The fine arts program must provide instruction in the essential knowledge and skills identified for fine arts by the State Board of Education under Section 28.002(c). The fine arts program may be provided on or off a school campus and outside the regular school day.

(b-10) A school district, with the approval of the commissioner, may allow a student to comply with the curriculum requirements for the physical education credit required under Subsection (b-1)(8) by participating in a private or commercially sponsored physical activity program provided on or off a school campus and outside the regular school day.

(b-11) In adopting rules under Subsection (b-1), the State Board of Education shall allow a student who is unable to participate in physical activity due to disability or illness to substitute one credit in English language arts, mathematics, science, or social studies, one credit in a course that is offered for credit as provided by Section 28.002(g-1), or one academic elective credit for the physical education credit required under Subsection (b-1)(8). A credit allowed to be substituted under this subsection may not also be used by the student to satisfy a graduation requirement other than completion of the physical education credit. The rules must provide that the determination regarding a student's ability to participate in physical activity will be made by:

(1) if the student receives special education services under Subchapter A, Chapter 29, the student's admission, review, and dismissal committee;

(2) if the student does not receive special education services under Subchapter A, Chapter 29, but is covered by Section 504, Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Section 794), the committee established for the student under that Act; or

(3) if each of the committees described by Subdivisions (1) and (2) is inapplicable, a committee established by the school district of persons with appropriate knowledge regarding the student.

(b-12) In adopting rules under Subsection (b-1), the State Board of Education shall adopt criteria to allow a student to comply with the curriculum requirements for the two credits in a language other than English required under Subsection (b-1)(5) by substituting two credits in computer programming languages, including computer coding.

(b-13) In adopting rules under Subsection (b-1), the State Board of Education shall allow a student to substitute credit in another appropriate course for the second credit in the same language in a language other than English otherwise required by Subsection (b-1)(5) if the student, in completing the first credit required under Subsection (b-1)(5), demonstrates that the student is unlikely to be able to complete the second credit. The board rules must establish:

(1) the standards and, as applicable, the appropriate school personnel for making a determination under this subsection; and

(2) appropriate substitute courses for purposes of this subsection.

(b-14) In adopting rules under Subsection (b-1), the State Board of Education shall allow a student who, due to disability, is unable to complete two courses in the same language in a language other than English, as provided under Subsection (b-1)(5), to substitute for those credits two credits in English language arts, mathematics, science, or social studies or two credits in career and technology education, technology applications, or other academic electives. A credit allowed to be substituted under this subsection may not also be used by the student to satisfy a graduation credit requirement other than credit for completion of a language other than English. The rules must provide that the determination regarding a student's ability to participate in language-other-than-English courses will be made by:

(1) if the student receives special education services under Subchapter A, Chapter 29, the student's admission, review, and dismissal committee; or

(2) if the student does not receive special education services under Subchapter A, Chapter 29, but is covered by Section 504, Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Section 794), the committee established for the student under that Act.

(b-15) A student may earn a distinguished level of achievement under the foundation high school program by successfully completing:

(1) four credits in mathematics, which must include Algebra II and the courses described by Subsection (b-1)(2);

(2) four credits in science, which must include the courses described by Subsection (b-1)(3);

(3) the remaining curriculum requirements under Subsection (b-1); and

(4) the curriculum requirements for at least one endorsement under Subsection (c-1).

(b-16) A student may satisfy an elective credit required under Subsection (b-1)(6) with a credit earned to satisfy the additional curriculum requirements for the distinguished level of achievement under the foundation high school program or an endorsement under Subsection (c-1). This subsection may apply to more than one elective credit.

(b-17) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules to ensure that a student may comply with the curriculum requirements under Subsection (b-1)(6) by successfully completing an advanced career and technical course, including a course that may lead to an industry-recognized credential or certificate or an associate degree.

(b-18) In adopting rules under Subsection (b-1), the State Board of Education shall allow a student to comply with the curriculum requirements under Subsection (b-1) by successfully completing a dual credit course.

(b-19) In adopting rules under Subsection (b-1), the State Board of Education shall adopt criteria to allow a student to comply with curriculum requirements for the world geography or world history credit under Subsection (b-1)(4) by successfully completing a combined world history and world geography course developed by the State Board of Education.

(b-20) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules to include the instruction developed under Section 28.012 in one or more courses in the required curriculum for students in grade levels 9 through 12.

(b-21) In adopting rules under Subsection (b-1), the State Board of Education shall adopt criteria to allow a student to comply with the curriculum requirement for one credit under Subsection (b-1)(5) by successfully completing at an elementary school either a dual language immersion program under Section 28.0051 or a course in American Sign Language.

(b-22) In adopting rules under Subsection (b-1), the State Board of Education shall ensure that a personal financial literacy & economics course taken to comply with the curriculum requirement under Subsection (b-1)(4) allocates:

(1) two-thirds of instruction time to instruction in personal financial literacy; and

(2) one-third of instruction time to instruction in economics.

(b-23) The agency shall:

(1) develop a list of free, open-source, and publicly available curricula that may be used by a school district to provide a personal financial literacy & economics course that satisfies the curriculum requirement under Subsection (b-1)(4); and

(2) seek, accept, and spend any federal or private grant funds and gifts that are available for the purpose of providing a personal financial literacy & economics course as part of the foundation high school program.

(c) A person may receive a diploma if the person is eligible for a diploma under Section 28.0251. In other cases, a student may graduate and receive a diploma only if:

(1) the student successfully completes the curriculum requirements identified by the State Board of Education under Subsection (a) and complies with Sections 28.0256 and 39.025; or

(2) the student successfully completes an individualized education program developed under Section 29.005.

(c-1) A student may earn an endorsement on the student's transcript by successfully completing curriculum requirements for that endorsement adopted by the State Board of Education by rule. The State Board of Education by rule shall provide students with multiple options for earning each endorsement, including, to the greatest extent possible, coherent sequences of courses. The State Board of Education by rule must permit a student to enroll in courses under more than one endorsement curriculum before the student's junior year. An endorsement under this subsection may be earned in any of the following categories:

(1) science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM), which includes courses directly related to science, including environmental science, technology, including computer science, cybersecurity, and computer coding, engineering, and advanced mathematics;

(2) business and industry, which includes courses directly related to database management, information technology, communications, accounting, finance, marketing, graphic design, architecture, construction, welding, logistics, automotive technology, agricultural science, and heating, ventilation, and air conditioning;

(3) public services, which includes courses directly related to health sciences and occupations, mental health, education and training, law enforcement, and culinary arts and hospitality;

(4) arts and humanities, which includes courses directly related to political science, world languages, cultural studies, English literature, history, and fine arts; and

(5) multidisciplinary studies, which allows a student to:

(A) select courses from the curriculum of each endorsement area described by Subdivisions (1) through (4); and

(B) earn credits in a variety of advanced courses from multiple content areas sufficient to complete the distinguished level of achievement under the foundation high school program.

(c-2) In adopting rules under Subsection (c-1), the State Board of Education shall:

(1) require a student in order to earn any endorsement to successfully complete:

(A) four credits in mathematics, which must include:

(i) the courses described by Subsection (b-1)(2); and

(ii) an additional advanced mathematics course authorized under Subsection (b-2) or an advanced career and technology course designated by the State Board of Education;

(B) four credits in science, which must include:

(i) the courses described by Subsection (b-1)(3); and

(ii) an additional advanced science course authorized under Subsection (b-2) or an advanced career and technology course designated by the State Board of Education; and

(C) two elective credits in addition to the elective credits required under Subsection (b-1)(6); and

(2) develop additional curriculum requirements for each endorsement with the direct participation of educators and business, labor, and industry representatives, and shall require each school district to report to the agency the categories of endorsements under Subsection (c-1) for which the district offers all courses for curriculum requirements, as determined by board rule.

(c-3) In adopting rules under Subsection (c-1), the State Board of Education shall adopt criteria to allow a student participating in the arts and humanities endorsement under Subsection (c-1)(4), with the written permission of the student's parent or a person standing in parental relation to the student, to comply with the curriculum requirements for science required under Subsection (c-2)(1)(B)(ii) by substituting for an advanced course requirement a course related to that endorsement.

(c-4) Each school district must make available to high school students courses that allow a student to complete the curriculum requirements for at least one endorsement under Subsection (c-1). A school district that offers only one endorsement curriculum must offer the multidisciplinary studies endorsement curriculum.

(c-5) A student may earn a performance acknowledgment on the student's transcript by satisfying the requirements for that acknowledgment adopted by the State Board of Education by rule. An acknowledgment under this subsection may be earned:

(1) for outstanding performance:

(A) in a dual credit course;

(B) in bilingualism and biliteracy;

(C) on a college advanced placement test or international baccalaureate examination;

(D) on an established, valid, reliable, and nationally norm-referenced preliminary college preparation assessment instrument used to measure a student's progress toward readiness for college and the workplace; or

(E) on an established, valid, reliable, and nationally norm-referenced assessment instrument used by colleges and universities as part of their undergraduate admissions process; or

(2) for earning a state recognized or nationally or internationally recognized business or industry certification or license.

(c-6) Notwithstanding Subsection (c), a person may receive a diploma if the person is eligible for a diploma under Section 28.0258.

(c-7) Subject to Subsection (c-8), a student who is enrolled in a special education program under Subchapter A, Chapter 29, may earn an endorsement on the student's transcript by:

(1) successfully completing, with or without modification of the curriculum:

(A) the curriculum requirements identified by the State Board of Education under Subsection (a); and

(B) the additional endorsement curriculum requirements prescribed by the State Board of Education under Subsection (c-2); and

(2) successfully completing all curriculum requirements for that endorsement adopted by the State Board of Education:

(A) without modification of the curriculum; or

(B) with modification of the curriculum, provided that the curriculum, as modified, is sufficiently rigorous as determined by the student's admission, review, and dismissal committee.

(c-8) For purposes of Subsection (c-7), the admission, review, and dismissal committee of a student in a special education program under Subchapter A, Chapter 29, shall determine whether the student is required to achieve satisfactory performance on an end-of-course assessment instrument to earn an endorsement on the student's transcript.

(c-10) In adopting rules under Subsection (c-1), the State Board of Education shall adopt or select five technology applications courses on cybersecurity to be included in a cybersecurity pathway for the science, technology, engineering, and mathematics endorsement.

(d) A school district may issue a certificate of coursework completion to a student who successfully completes the curriculum requirements identified by the State Board of Education under Subsection (a) but who fails to comply with Section 39.025. A school district may allow a student who receives a certificate to participate in a graduation ceremony with students receiving high school diplomas.

(e) Each school district shall report the academic achievement record of students who have completed the foundation high school program on transcript forms adopted by the State Board of Education. The transcript forms adopted by the board must be designed to clearly identify whether a student received a diploma or a certificate of coursework completion.

(e-1) A school district shall clearly indicate a distinguished level of achievement under the foundation high school program as described by Subsection (b-15), an endorsement described by Subsection (c-1), and a performance acknowledgment described by Subsection (c-5) on the transcript of a student who satisfies the applicable requirements. The State Board of Education shall adopt rules as necessary to administer this subsection.

(e-2) At the end of each school year, each school district shall report through the Public Education Information Management System (PEIMS) the number of district students who, during that school year, were:

(1) enrolled in the foundation high school program;

(2) pursuing the distinguished level of achievement under the foundation high school program as provided by Subsection (b-15); and

(3) enrolled in a program to earn an endorsement described by Subsection (c-1).

(e-3) Information reported under Subsection (e-2) must be disaggregated by all student groups served by the district, including categories of race, ethnicity, socioeconomic status, sex, and populations served by special programs, including students in special education programs under Subchapter A, Chapter 29.

(f) A school district shall issue a certificate of attendance to a student who receives special education services under Subchapter A, Chapter 29, and who has completed four years of high school but has not completed the student's individualized education program. A school district shall allow a student who receives a certificate to participate in a graduation ceremony with students receiving high school diplomas. A student may participate in only one graduation ceremony under this subsection. This subsection does not preclude a student from receiving a diploma under Subsection (c)(2).

(g) Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211, Sec. 78(b)(3), eff. September 1, 2014.

(h) Expired.

(i) If an 11th or 12th grade student who is homeless or in the conservatorship of the Department of Family and Protective Services transfers to a different school district and the student is ineligible to graduate from the district to which the student transfers, the district from which the student transferred shall award a diploma at the student's request, if the student meets the graduation requirements of the district from which the student transferred.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 767, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 397, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 187, Sec. 2, eff. May 19, 2001; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 834, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 365, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 6.003, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1317, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 164 (H.B. 25), Sec. 4, eff. May 27, 2005.

Acts 2006, 79th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 5 (H.B. 1), Sec. 5.02, eff. May 31, 2006.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 46 (S.B. 673), Sec. 1, eff. May 28, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 763 (H.B. 3485), Sec. 4, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 895 (H.B. 3), Sec. 30, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 714 (H.B. 692), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 926 (S.B. 1620), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1163 (H.B. 2702), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 16(a), eff. June 10, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 78(b)(3), eff. September 1, 2014.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 214 (H.B. 2201), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1354 (S.B. 1404), Sec. 4, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 5 (S.B. 149), Sec. 2, eff. May 11, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 7 (H.B. 181), Sec. 1, eff. May 13, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 96 (H.B. 1430), Sec. 2, eff. May 23, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 934 (H.B. 2349), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1206 (S.B. 1494), Sec. 4, eff. June 19, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 63 (S.B. 671), Sec. 1, eff. May 22, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 307 (S.B. 826), Sec. 1, eff. May 29, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 513 (S.B. 30), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 549 (S.B. 463), Sec. 2, eff. June 9, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1088 (H.B. 3593), Sec. 2, eff. June 15, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 14 (S.B. 213), Sec. 2, eff. May 7, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 597 (S.B. 668), Sec. 1.05, eff. June 10, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 625 (S.B. 1374), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 165), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 739 (H.B. 678), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 2.014, eff. June 12, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 321 (H.B. 1603), Sec. 2, eff. June 7, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 433 (S.B. 1063), Sec. 1, eff. June 8, 2021.

Sec. 28.0251. HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA FOR CERTAIN VETERANS. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, a school district may issue a high school diploma to a person who:

(1) is an honorably discharged member of the armed forces of the United States;

(2) was scheduled to graduate from high school:

(A) after 1940 and before 1975; or

(B) after 1989; and

(3) left school after completing the sixth or a higher grade, before graduating from high school, to serve in:

(A) World War II, the Korean War, the Vietnam War, the Persian Gulf War, the Iraq War, or the war in Afghanistan; or

(B) any other war formally declared by the United States, military engagement authorized by the United States Congress, military engagement authorized by a United Nations Security Council resolution and funded by the United States Congress, or conflict authorized by the president of the United States under the War Powers Resolution of 1973 (50 U.S.C. Section 1541 et seq.).

(b) A school district may issue a diploma to a person otherwise eligible under Subsection (a) notwithstanding the fact that the person holds a high school equivalency certificate or is deceased.

(c) The commissioner by rule shall adopt a form for a diploma application to be used by a veteran or a person acting on behalf of a deceased veteran under this section. The commissioner shall specify acceptable evidence of eligibility for a diploma under this section.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 187, Sec. 1, eff. May 19, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 540 (H.B. 1058), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 642 (S.B. 966), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 28.0252. COMPUTATION OF HIGH SCHOOL GRADE POINT AVERAGE. (a) The commissioner may develop a standard method of computing a student's high school grade point average that provides for additional weight to be given to each honors course, advanced placement course, international baccalaureate course, or dual credit course completed by a student.

(b) If the commissioner develops a standard method under this section, a school district shall use the standard method to compute a student's high school grade point average.

(b-1) Expired.

(c) The commissioner may adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 293 (S.B. 111), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1369 (H.B. 3851), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 895 (H.B. 3), Sec. 31, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 28.0253. TEXAS FIRST EARLY HIGH SCHOOL COMPLETION PROGRAM. (a) In this section:

(1) "Coordinating board" means the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

(2) "Eligible institution" means an institution of higher education.

(3) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(4) "Program" means the Texas First Early High School Completion Program established under this section.

(b) The agency, in coordination with the coordinating board, shall establish the Texas First Early High School Completion Program to allow public high school students who demonstrate early readiness for college to graduate early from high school. The purpose of the program, in conjunction with the Texas First Scholarship Program established under Subchapter K-1, Chapter 56, is to promote efficiency in the state public education system and incentivize the enrollment of high performing students at eligible institutions.

(c) The coordinating board, in consultation with the agency and eligible institutions, shall by rule establish standards for use in the program regarding:

(1) the specific competencies that demonstrate a student's mastery of each subject area for which the coordinating board and the commissioner have adopted college readiness standards;

(2) the specific competencies that demonstrate a student's mastery of a language other than English; and

(3) acceptable assessments or other means by which a student may demonstrate the student's early readiness for college with respect to each subject area and the language described by Subdivision (2), subject to Subsection (d).

(d) The assessments or other means the coordinating board establishes under Subsection (c)(3) must be equivalent to the assessments or other means eligible institutions commonly use to place students at the institutions in courses that may be credited toward a degree requirement.

(e) A school district or open-enrollment charter school shall allow a student to graduate and receive a high school diploma under the program if, using the standards established under Subsection (c), the student demonstrates mastery of and early readiness for college in each of the subject areas described by that subsection and in a language other than English, notwithstanding any other local or state requirements.

(f) A student who earns a high school diploma through the program is considered to have earned a distinguished level of achievement under the foundation high school program adopted under Section 28.025. The student is not guaranteed admission to any institution of higher education or to any academic program at an institution of higher education solely on the basis of having received the diploma through the program. The student may apply for admission to an institution of higher education for the first semester or other academic term after the semester or other academic term in which the student earns a diploma through the program.

(g) On a student's initial enrollment in high school in a grade level below grade 12 in a school district or open-enrollment charter school, the district or school shall provide to the student and the student's parent or guardian information regarding:

(1) the requirements to earn a high school diploma under the program; and

(2) the Texas First Scholarship Program established under Subchapter K-1, Chapter 56.

(h) The agency and the coordinating board shall jointly prepare and post on their respective Internet websites a publication that includes the information required to be provided under Subsection (g) in a form that enables a school district or open-enrollment charter school to reproduce the publication for distribution under that subsection.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 895 (H.B. 3), Sec. 32, eff. June 19, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 17(a), eff. June 10, 2013.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 962 (S.B. 1888), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 265 (S.B. 2294), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 265 (S.B. 2294), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 28.0254. POSTHUMOUS HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA FOR CERTAIN STUDENTS. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, but subject to Subsection (b), on request of the student's parent, a school district shall issue a high school diploma posthumously to each student who died while enrolled in the district at the end of the school year in which the student was expected to graduate under the regular schedule of school attendance. The high school diploma may not be issued before the graduation date of the class in which the student was enrolled at the time of death.

(b) A school district is not required to issue a high school diploma to a student described by Subsection (a) if the student at any time before the student's death was convicted of a felony offense under Title 5 or 6, Penal Code, or adjudicated as having engaged in conduct constituting a felony offense under Title 5 or 6, Penal Code.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 871 (H.B. 1563), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 122 (H.B. 638), Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 2019.

Sec. 28.02541. DIPLOMA FOR CERTAIN STUDENTS WHO ENTERED NINTH GRADE BEFORE 2011-2012 SCHOOL YEAR. (a) This section applies only to a student who:

(1) entered the ninth grade before the 2011-2012 school year;

(2) successfully completed the curriculum requirements for high school graduation applicable to the student when the student entered the ninth grade;

(3) has not performed satisfactorily on an assessment instrument or a part of an assessment instrument required for high school graduation, including an alternate assessment instrument offered under Section 39.025(c-2); and

(4) has been administered the assessment instrument or the part of the assessment instrument for which the student has not performed satisfactorily at least three times.

(b) Notwithstanding the requirements under this subchapter, the commissioner by rule shall establish a procedure to determine whether a student subject to this section may qualify to graduate and receive a high school diploma as provided by this section.

(c) In adopting rules under this section, the commissioner:

(1) shall designate the school district in which a student is enrolled or was last enrolled to make the decision regarding whether the student qualifies to graduate and receive a high school diploma; and

(2) shall establish criteria for school districts to develop recommendations for alternative requirements by which a student subject to this section may qualify to graduate and receive a high school diploma.

(d) In adopting rules under Subsection (c)(2), the commissioner may authorize as an alternative requirement:

(1) an alternative assessment instrument and performance standard for that assessment instrument;

(2) work experience; or

(3) military or other relevant life experience.

(e) A school district's decision regarding whether the student qualifies to graduate and receive a high school diploma is final and may not be appealed.

(f) The commissioner shall adopt rules to administer this section.

(g) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 321 (H.B. 1603), Sec. 6, eff. June 7, 2021.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 549 (S.B. 463), Sec. 3, eff. June 9, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 14 (S.B. 213), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 14 (S.B. 213), Sec. 4, eff. May 7, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 321 (H.B. 1603), Sec. 6, eff. June 7, 2021.

Sec. 28.0256. FINANCIAL AID APPLICATION REQUIREMENT FOR HIGH SCHOOL GRADUATION. (a) Before graduating from high school, each student must complete and submit a free application for federal student aid (FAFSA) or a Texas application for state financial aid (TASFA), except as otherwise provided by Subsection (b).

(b) A student is not required to comply with Subsection (a) if:

(1) the student's parent or other person standing in parental relation submits a signed form indicating that the parent or other person authorizes the student to decline to complete and submit the financial aid application;

(2) the student signs and submits the form described by Subdivision (1) on the student's own behalf if the student is 18 years of age or older or the student's disabilities of minority have been removed for general purposes under Chapter 31, Family Code; or

(3) a school counselor authorizes the student to decline to complete and submit the financial aid application for good cause, as determined by the school counselor.

(c) A school district or open-enrollment charter school shall adopt a form to be used for purposes of Subsection (b). The form must:

(1) be approved by the agency;

(2) provide the student or the student's parent or other person standing in parental relation, as applicable, the opportunity to decline to complete and submit a financial aid application, as provided by Subsection (b); and

(3) be made available in English, Spanish, and any other language spoken by a majority of the students enrolled in a bilingual education or special language program under Subchapter B, Chapter 29, in the district or school.

(d) If a school counselor notifies a school district or open-enrollment charter school whether a student has complied with this section for purposes of determining whether the student meets high school graduation requirements under Section 28.025, the school counselor may only indicate whether the student has complied with this section and may not indicate the manner in which the student complied, except as necessary for the district or school to comply with rules adopted under Subsection (e)(2). A school counselor may not indicate that a student has not complied with this section if the school district or open-enrollment charter school fails to provide the form adopted under Subsection (c) to the student or the student's parent or other person standing in parental relation to the student.

(e) The commissioner shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this section, including rules to:

(1) establish:

(A) a timeline for:

(i) the distribution to students of the free application for federal student aid or Texas application for state financial aid and the form adopted under Subsection (c); and

(ii) the submission of a form under Subsection (b);

(B) standards regarding the information that a school district or open-enrollment charter school must provide to students regarding:

(i) in accordance with Section 33.007(b)(5), instructions for filling out the free application for federal student aid or Texas application for state financial aid; and

(ii) the options available to a student under Subsection (b) if the student wishes to decline to complete and submit a financial aid application; and

(C) the method by which a student must provide to a school district or open-enrollment charter school proof that the student has completed and submitted the free application for federal student aid or Texas application for state financial aid as required by this section;

(2) require each school district and open-enrollment charter school to report to the agency:

(A) the number of students who completed and submitted a financial aid application under Subsection (a); and

(B) the number of students who received an exception from complying with Subsection (a) under Subsection (b); and

(3) ensure compliance with federal law regarding confidentiality of student educational information, including the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (20 U.S.C. Section 1232g), and any state law relating to the privacy of student information.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 2.015, eff. June 12, 2019.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 559 (S.B. 369), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2021.

Sec. 28.0258. HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA AWARDED ON BASIS OF INDIVIDUAL GRADUATION COMMITTEE REVIEW. (a) This section applies only to an 11th or 12th grade student who has failed to comply with the end-of-course assessment instrument performance requirements under Section 39.025 for not more than two courses.

(b) For each student to whom this section applies, the school district that the student attends shall establish an individual graduation committee at the end of or after the student's 11th grade year to determine whether the student may qualify to graduate as provided by this section. A student may not qualify to graduate under this section before the student's 12th grade year. The committee shall be composed of:

(1) the principal or principal's designee;

(2) for each end-of-course assessment instrument on which the student failed to perform satisfactorily, the teacher of the course;

(3) the department chair or lead teacher supervising the teacher described by Subdivision (2); and

(4) as applicable:

(A) the student's parent or person standing in parental relation to the student;

(B) a designated advocate described by Subsection (c) if the person described by Paragraph (A) is unable to serve; or

(C) the student, at the student's option, if the student is at least 18 years of age or is an emancipated minor.

(c) The commissioner by rule shall establish a procedure for appointing an alternative committee member if a person described by Subsection (b) is unable to serve, including appointing a designated advocate for the student if the student's parent or person standing in parental relation to the student is unable to serve. The superintendent of each school district shall establish procedures for the convening of an individual graduation committee.

(c-2) A school district shall provide an appropriate translator, if available, for the appropriate person described under Subsection (b)(4) who is unable to speak English.

(d) The school district shall ensure a good faith effort is made to timely notify the appropriate person described under Subsection (b)(4) of the time and place for convening the individual graduation committee and the purpose of the committee. The notice must be:

(1) provided in person or by regular mail or e-mail;

(2) clear and easy to understand; and

(3) written in English, in Spanish, or, to the extent practicable, in the native language of the appropriate person described by Subsection (b)(4).

(e) To be eligible to graduate and receive a high school diploma under this section, a student must successfully complete the curriculum requirements required for high school graduation identified by the State Board of Education under Section 28.025(a).

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, a student's individual graduation committee established under this section shall recommend additional requirements by which the student may qualify to graduate, including:

(1) additional remediation; and

(2) for each end-of-course assessment instrument on which the student failed to perform satisfactorily:

(A) the completion of a project related to the subject area of the course that demonstrates proficiency in the subject area; or

(B) the preparation of a portfolio of work samples in the subject area of the course, including work samples from the course that demonstrate proficiency in the subject area.

(g) For purposes of Subsection (f), a student may submit to the individual graduation committee coursework previously completed to satisfy a recommended additional requirement.

(h) In determining whether a student for whom an individual graduation committee is established is qualified to graduate, the committee shall consider:

(1) the recommendation of the student's teacher in each course for which the student failed to perform satisfactorily on an end-of-course assessment instrument;

(2) the student's grade in each course for which the student failed to perform satisfactorily on an end-of-course assessment instrument;

(3) the student's score on each end-of-course assessment instrument on which the student failed to perform satisfactorily;

(4) the student's performance on any additional requirements recommended by the committee under Subsection (f);

(5) the number of hours of remediation that the student has attended, including:

(A) attendance in a college preparatory course required under Section 39.025(b-2), if applicable; or

(B) attendance in and successful completion of a transitional college course in reading or mathematics;

(6) the student's school attendance rate;

(7) the student's satisfaction of any of the Texas Success Initiative (TSI) college readiness benchmarks prescribed by the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board;

(8) the student's successful completion of a dual credit course in English, mathematics, science, or social studies;

(9) the student's successful completion of a high school pre-advanced placement, advanced placement, or international baccalaureate program course in English, mathematics, science, or social studies;

(10) the student's rating of advanced high on the most recent high school administration of the Texas English Language Proficiency Assessment System;

(11) the student's score of 50 or greater on a College-Level Examination Program examination;

(12) the student's score on the ACT, the SAT, or the Armed Services Vocational Aptitude Battery test;

(13) the student's completion of a sequence of courses under a career and technical education program required to attain an industry-recognized credential or certificate;

(14) the student's overall preparedness for postsecondary success; and

(15) any other academic information designated for consideration by the board of trustees of the school district.

(i) After considering the criteria under Subsection (h), the individual graduation committee may determine that the student is qualified to graduate. Notwithstanding any other law, a student for whom an individual graduation committee is established may graduate and receive a high school diploma on the basis of the committee's decision only if the student successfully completes all additional requirements recommended by the committee under Subsection (f), the student meets the requirements of Subsection (e), and the committee's vote is unanimous. The commissioner by rule shall establish a timeline for making a determination under this subsection. This subsection does not create a property interest in graduation. The decision of a committee is final and may not be appealed.

(j) Notwithstanding any action taken by an individual graduation committee under this section, a school district shall administer an end-of-course assessment instrument to any student who fails to perform satisfactorily on an end-of-course assessment instrument as provided by Section 39.025(b). For purposes of Section 39.053(c)(1), an assessment instrument administered as provided by this subsection is considered an assessment instrument required for graduation retaken by a student.

(k) The commissioner shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this section not later than the 2015-2016 school year.

(l) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 321 (H.B. 1603), Sec. 6, eff. June 7, 2021.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 5 (S.B. 149), Sec. 3, eff. May 11, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 549 (S.B. 463), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2018.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 549 (S.B. 463), Sec. 5, eff. June 9, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 14 (S.B. 213), Sec. 5, eff. May 7, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 194 (H.B. 999), Sec. 1, eff. May 31, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 321 (H.B. 1603), Sec. 6, eff. June 7, 2021.

Sec. 28.0259. SCHOOL DISTRICT REPORTING REQUIREMENTS FOR STUDENTS GRADUATING BASED ON INDIVIDUAL GRADUATION COMMITTEE REVIEW PROCESS. (a) Each school district shall report through the Public Education Information Management System (PEIMS) the number of district students each school year for which an individual graduation committee is established under Section 28.0258 and the number of district students each school year who are awarded a diploma based on the decision of an individual graduation committee as provided by Section 28.0258.

(b) A school district shall report the information required by Subsection (a) not later than December 1 of the school year following the school year the student is awarded a diploma.

(c) The agency shall make the information reported under this section available on the agency's Internet website.

(d) The commissioner shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this section not later than the 2015-2016 school year.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 321 (H.B. 1603), Sec. 6, eff. June 7, 2021.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 5 (S.B. 149), Sec. 3, eff. May 11, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 549 (S.B. 463), Sec. 6, eff. June 9, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 549 (S.B. 463), Sec. 7, eff. June 9, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 14 (S.B. 213), Sec. 6, eff. May 7, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 321 (H.B. 1603), Sec. 6, eff. June 7, 2021.

Sec. 28.02591. TEXAS HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD REPORTING REQUIREMENTS FOR STUDENTS GRADUATING BASED ON INDIVIDUAL GRADUATION COMMITTEE REVIEW PROCESS. (a) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board, in coordination with the agency, shall collect longitudinal data relating to the post-graduation pursuits of each student who is awarded a diploma based on the determination of an individual graduation committee under Section 28.0258, including whether the student:

(1) enters the workforce;

(2) enrolls in an associate degree or certificate program at a public or private institution of higher education;

(3) enrolls in a bachelor's degree program at a public or private institution of higher education; or

(4) enlists in the armed forces of the United States or the Texas National Guard.

(b) Not later than December 1 of each even-numbered year, the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board shall provide a report to the legislature that includes a summary compilation of the data collected under Subsection (a) that is presented in a manner that does not identify an individual student.

(c) The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board and the agency shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 549 (S.B. 463), Sec. 8, eff. June 9, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 14 (S.B. 213), Sec. 7, eff. May 7, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 321 (H.B. 1603), Sec. 3, eff. June 7, 2021.

Sec. 28.026. NOTICE OF REQUIREMENTS FOR AUTOMATIC COLLEGE ADMISSION AND FINANCIAL AID. (a) The board of trustees of a school district and the governing body of each open-enrollment charter school that provides a high school shall require each high school in the district or provided by the charter school, as applicable, to post appropriate signs in each school counselor's office, in each principal's office, and in each administrative building indicating the substance of Section 51.803 regarding automatic college admission and stating the curriculum requirements for financial aid authorized under Title 3. To assist in the dissemination of that information, the district or charter school shall:

(1) require that each school counselor and class advisor at a high school be provided a detailed explanation of the substance of Section 51.803 and the curriculum requirements for financial aid authorized under Title 3;

(2) provide each district or school student, at the time the student first registers for one or more classes required for high school graduation, with a written notification, including a detailed explanation in plain language, of the substance of Section 51.803, the curriculum requirements for financial aid authorized under Title 3, and the benefits of completing the requirements for that automatic admission and financial aid;

(3) require that each school counselor and senior class advisor at a high school explain to eligible students the substance of Section 51.803; and

(4) not later than the 14th day after the last day of classes for the fall semester or an equivalent date in the case of a school operated on a year-round system under Section 25.084, provide each senior student eligible under Section 51.803 and each student enrolled in the junior year of high school who has a grade point average in the top 10 percent of the student's high school class, and the student's parent or guardian, with a written notification of the student's eligibility with a detailed explanation in plain language of the substance of Section 51.803.

(b) The commissioner shall adopt forms, including specific language, to use in providing notice under Subsections (a)(2) and (4). In providing notice under Subsection (a)(2) or (4), a school district or open-enrollment charter school shall use the appropriate form adopted by the commissioner. The notice to a student and the student's parent or guardian under Subsections (a)(2) and (4) must be on a single form that contains signature lines to indicate receipt of notice by the student and the student's parent or guardian. The notice under Subsection (a)(2) must be signed by the student's counselor in addition to being signed by the student and the student's parent or guardian.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1511, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 175), Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 18(a), eff. June 10, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 443 (S.B. 715), Sec. 20, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 28.027. APPLIED SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, ENGINEERING, AND MATHEMATICS COURSES. (a) In this section, "applied STEM course" means an applied science, technology, engineering, or mathematics course offered as part of a school district's career and technology education or technology applications curriculum.

Text of subsection as amended by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 19

(b) The State Board of Education shall establish a process under which an applied STEM course may be reviewed and approved for purposes of satisfying the mathematics and science curriculum requirements for the foundation high school program under Section 28.025 through substitution of the applied STEM course for a specific mathematics or science course otherwise required under the foundation high school program. The State Board of Education may only approve a course to substitute for a science course taken after successful completion of biology.

Text of subsection as amended by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 214 (H.B. 2201), Sec. 3

(b) The State Board of Education shall establish a process under which an applied STEM course may be reviewed and approved for purposes of satisfying the mathematics and science curriculum requirements for the recommended high school program imposed under Section 28.025(b-1)(1)(A) through substitution of the applied STEM course for a specific mathematics or science course otherwise required under the recommended high school program. The State Board of Education may only approve a course to substitute for a mathematics course taken after successful completion of Algebra I and geometry. The State Board of Education may only approve a course to substitute for a science course taken after successful completion of biology.

(c) The process must provide that an applied STEM course is entitled to be approved for the purpose described by Subsection (b) if the course meets the following requirements:

(1) the applied STEM course is part of a curriculum created by a recognized national or international business and industry group to prepare a student for a national or international business and industry certification or license;

(2) the applied STEM course qualifies as:

(A) a dual credit course; or

(B) an articulated postsecondary course provided for local credit or articulated postsecondary advanced technical credit course provided for state credit;

(3) the essential knowledge and skills covered in the applied STEM course are equivalent to the essential knowledge and skills covered in the mathematics or science course for which the applied STEM course is proposed to be approved for substitution; and

(4) the applied STEM course:

(A) provides substantial mathematics content or science content, as applicable, taught in an applied or symbolic format, that enables a student to develop relevant critical thinking skills necessary for preparation for employment or additional training in a career identified by the Texas Workforce Commission as a high-demand or emerging occupation; and

(B) incorporates college and career readiness skills.

(d) If an applied STEM course approved under this section is part of a coherent sequence of career and technology courses, a student is eligible to enroll in the applied STEM course for the purpose described in Subsection (b) only if the student has completed the prerequisite course work, if any, for the applied STEM course.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 926 (S.B. 1620), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 19(a), eff. June 10, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 214 (H.B. 2201), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 28.029. MIDDLE SCHOOL ADVANCED MATHEMATICS PROGRAM. (a) To increase the number of students who complete advanced mathematics courses in high school, each school district and open-enrollment charter school shall develop an advanced mathematics program for middle school students that is designed to enable those students to enroll in Algebra I in eighth grade.

(b) Under the program, subject to Subsection (c), a school district or open-enrollment charter school shall automatically enroll in an advanced mathematics course each sixth grade student who performed in the top 40 percent on:

(1) the fifth grade mathematics assessment instrument administered under Section 39.023(a); or

(2) a local measure that includes the student's fifth grade class ranking or a demonstrated proficiency in the student's fifth grade mathematics coursework.

(c) The parent or guardian of a student described by Subsection (b) may opt the student out of automatic enrollment under that subsection.

(d) The commissioner may adopt rules to implement this section.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 262 (S.B. 2124), Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER C. ADVANCED PLACEMENT INCENTIVES

Sec. 28.051. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Board" means the State Board of Education.

(2) "College advanced placement course" means a board-approved high-school-level preparatory course for a college advanced placement test that incorporates all topics specified by the college board on its standard syllabus for a given subject area.

(3) "College advanced placement test" means the advanced placement test administered by the College Board and Educational Testing Service.

(4) "College board" means the College Board and Educational Testing Service.

(5) "International baccalaureate course" means a high-school-level preparatory course for an international baccalaureate examination that incorporates each topic specified by the International Baccalaureate Organization on its standard syllabus for a particular subject area.

(6) "International baccalaureate examination" means the international baccalaureate examination administered by the International Baccalaureate Organization.

(7) "Program" means the Texas Advanced Placement Incentive Program.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 28.052. PROGRAM; PURPOSE. (a) The purpose of the Texas Advanced Placement Incentive Program is to recognize and reward those students, teachers, and schools that demonstrate success in achieving the state's educational goals.

(b) Awards and subsidies granted under the program are for the public purpose of promoting an educated citizenry.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 28.053. TYPES OF AWARDS. (a) A school participating in the program may be awarded:

(1) a one-time $3,000 equipment grant for providing a college advanced placement course or international baccalaureate course to be paid to a school based on need as determined by the commissioner; and

(2) $100 for each student who scores a three or better on a college advanced placement test or four or better on an international baccalaureate examination.

(b) Funds awarded under Subsection (a) shall be used in the manner determined by the campus team established, by the principal, under Subsection (c).

(c) The principal of each school participating in the program shall convene, at least annually, a team composed of not more than five members, with not fewer than three teachers, to include at least one teacher participating in the program and at least one teacher who teaches students in preparation for their participation in the program, for the purpose of determining the use of funds awarded under Subsection (a). Nothing in this section limits the authority of the team to direct expenditure of funds awarded under Subsection (a)(2) for awards to individual teachers participating in the program.

(d) A teacher participating in the program may be awarded:

(1) subsidized teacher training, not to exceed $450 for each teacher, for a college advanced placement course or an international baccalaureate course;

(2) a one-time award of $250 for teaching a college advanced placement course or an international baccalaureate course for the first time; and

(3) a share of the teacher bonus pool, which shall be distributed by the teacher's school in shares proportional to the number of courses taught.

(e) To be eligible for an award under Subsection (d), a teacher must teach a college advanced placement course or an international baccalaureate course.

(f) Fifty dollars may be deposited in the teacher bonus pool for each student enrolled in the school that scores a three or better on a college advanced placement test or four or better on an international baccalaureate examination.

(g) A student receiving a score of three or better on a college advanced placement test or four or better on an international baccalaureate examination may receive reimbursement, not to exceed $65, for the testing fee. The reimbursement shall be reduced by the amount of any subsidy awarded by the college board or the International Baccalaureate Organization or under Section 28.054.

(h) The commissioner may enter into agreements with the college board and the International Baccalaureate Organization to pay for all examinations taken by eligible public school students. An eligible student is a student who:

(1) takes a college advanced placement or international baccalaureate course at a public school or who is recommended by the student's principal or teacher to take the test; and

(2) demonstrates financial need as determined in accordance with guidelines adopted by the board that are consistent with the definition of financial need adopted by the college board or the International Baccalaureate Organization.

(i) The commissioner shall analyze and adjust, as needed, the sum of and number of awards to ensure that the purpose of the program is realized.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 854, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 4 (S.B. 1), Sec. 49.01, eff. September 28, 2011.

Sec. 28.054. SUBSIDIES FOR COLLEGE ADVANCED PLACEMENT TEST OR INTERNATIONAL BACCALAUREATE EXAMINATION. (a) A student is entitled to a subsidy for a fee paid by the student to take a college advanced placement test or an international baccalaureate examination if the student demonstrates financial need. The board shall adopt guidelines for determining financial need consistent with the definition of financial need adopted by the college board or the International Baccalaureate Organization.

(b) To obtain a subsidy under this section, a student must:

(1) pay the fee for each test or examination for which the student seeks a subsidy; and

(2) submit to the board through the student's school counselor a written application on a form prescribed by the commissioner demonstrating financial need and the amount of the fee paid by the student for each test or examination.

(c) On approval by the board, the agency may pay each eligible applicant an equal amount, not to exceed $25 for each applicant.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 443 (S.B. 715), Sec. 21, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 28.055. USE OF SCHOOL AWARDS; APPLICATION. (a) A school shall give priority to academic enhancement purposes in using an award received under the program. The award may not be used for any purpose related to athletics.

(b) To obtain an award under the program, a school must submit to the board a written application in a form, manner, and time prescribed by the commissioner.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 28.056. APPLICATION FOR TEACHER AWARDS AND REIMBURSEMENTS. To obtain an award or reimbursement for training expenses under the program, a teacher must submit to the board a written application in a form, manner, and time prescribed by the commissioner.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 28.057. FUNDING. (a) An award or subsidy granted under this subchapter may be funded by donations, grants, or legislative appropriations. The commissioner may solicit and receive grants and donations for making awards under this subchapter. The agency shall account for and distribute the donations, grants, or legislative appropriations.

(b) The agency shall apply to the program any available funds from its appropriations that may be used for purposes of the program.

(c) The grant of any award or subsidy under the program is subject to the availability of funds.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 28.058. CONFIDENTIALITY. All information regarding an individual student received by the commissioner under this subchapter from a school district or student is confidential under Chapter 552, Government Code.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.